…and we were left the scratches, dings, dents, and scuffed paint that you see in the pictures above.
You were broken that I might be healed
So, in April next year, the recently announced 5.2% rise in CPI will result in a 5.1% rise in the USS pension. Meanwhile, ironically, official pensions will rise by 5.2%, as they don’t have such a capping mechanism.
It’s difficult to explain why I let our relationship continue knowing all of this. Except to say that I loved what we had started. To say along with Jack Gilbert that “Anything worth doing is worth doing badly.” And there was a lot that was worth it. Or I might admit that I’ve always been a little like Abou Fatma in “The Four Feathers,” I felt that God had put him in my way and I had to see it through. The best I can do is to say that up until the very end he was my good and my bad guy.
Obviously, I did finally publish this story on my blog. As expected, most people said that it was a good “story”, but knowing me, that they knew it was just a “story” and was not in any way true. Anyone under the age of 12 that read the story, was scared to death of ever going to Red River again.
If love can’t find me …
There is a huge row raging now at least in Andhra Pradesh about some behavior predictability of individuals in general and women in particular based on certain land mark body changes and timing of such changes and future attitude predispositions. The height of the controversy is the matter going to Human Rights Commission-though it is not the proper venue either to observe understand or decide-rather than going to behavior psychologists, cultural anthropologists, behavior sociologists, cultural sociologists. Let us examine what this controversy is all about and how it should have been resolved.
“Those men that are the procurers and holders of slaves are the greatest villains in the world. They must be lost to all sensibility thinking that the stealing, robbing, enslaving, and murdering of men are not crimes.” QOC
1. REPORT the fraud to law enforcement. File a complaint with your local sheriff or city police, or State troopers. Have the cops forward a copy of the complaint to the appropriate authorities in the jurisdiction where the scammer is located. (For example, for Agent B, that would be a small town in New Jersey.)
Yes, it felt lonely because I had no context for most of my new experiences. Yes, the headaches sucked! (Imagine a 16-month migraine with its own ever-present jack hammer.) Yes, I became temporarily but completely disabled and unable to earn a living through any of my old or “normal” means. But even the loneliness, pain and financial insecurity brought gifts. I learned that we are never alone. Ever. We live in the most beautifully intertwined microcosm and macrocosms imaginable. We live as a bridge between matter and spirit, Earth and Heaven. We have guides and faeries and angels and devas dancing and singing and longing to help if we’ll just say the word. Believe it or not, the pain actually increased my ability to enjoy life. It anchored me to physical reality in a way that forced me to integrate body, mind, emotions and spirit. Pain, when pushed beyond our limits of endurance can sometimes become an intense version of its opposite. Monks used tools like flagellation, sleep deprivation and self torture in order to initiate mystical visions. I wouldn’t recommend it — there are easier ways! — but the pain did intensify the entire spectrum of my experience, including pleasure.
Every single time someone on the red team would lift up their light-up sword, Pink Shirt Guy would haul ass across the stadium-like setting to hold his light-up sword out to them in a declaration of.... loyalty? bravery? friendship? No one really knows, not even Pink Shirt Guy.
Eight other militiamen were on duty at that time but were away conducting security patrols for the barangay fiesta.
Nathan and Harvey exchanged glances. Oh. On reflection.... Perhaps..... Yes you're right, maybe it's time we went home old friend.
The song "Kvaðning" is featured on the debut album "Baldur", a concept album telling the epic and dramatic tale of the viking Baldur, released last year.
I promise not to dress my child like Little Man Tate.
- Return to a healthy diet
These beautiful rustic French shutters also came from Debbie, and I am hoping that hubby can do something with them so I can use them for a display prop on my stand at future fairs.
First up...Poetry Coffeehouse. This was a HUGE success. The pictures do not do it justice. We had a "fire" going on in the background, student artwork hanging up, and some pretty amazing poets!
but kite finds shapes in which the angels play.
This quilt was constructed very simply using the Quilt As You Go technique we learned back on week #7. 9 panels were each quilted separately, then connected using binding strips to create this monstrous 117 x 117 inch quilt.
Top with cherry pie filling.
Obadiah is one crazy, special little boy. He is moving everywhere--running, climbing, jabbering nonsense. He goes up and down the stairs with ease. He has 6 teeth--4 on top and 2 on bottom (just like Micah and Eden at 1 year!). He loves to eat chicken nuggets, pizza crust, lasagna (or anything with noodles), baked beans, and other soft foods--he loves to feed himself. He also loves to drink from a cup, whether it's a sippy cup, straw, or just a big kid cup. He loves water, juice, or milk. He thinks he loves my Pepsi, but I don't let him try it. ;) He is gradually weaning himself from nursing. He loves to nurse when he's tired, but during the day when he's the most busy he pushes me away and climbs down off my lap. He doesn't have time for me! He usually wakes up 3-5 times per night to nurse. I know what my doctor will say about that...she won't be too thrilled...but I also have been there, done that, so I know the days are numbered. Eventually he will give up night nursing too.
2011 Awards
What matters is I know what I’m worth, and I know that love, the real kind, is worth waiting for.
- You can enter as many times as you like as long as it is with NEW projects (no backlinking)
Done!
Eat
So the next time my wife and I talked about seeing The Girl With
Then there was the controversy over the City considering the sale of Point Hope lands. I will be starting my Jane’s Walk at the Point Hope Shipyard Lookout (pictured) on Sunday, so we’ll have a chance to discuss this issue in more depth. Here are some links that describe the background:
I had a friend who liked to shoot apples … but he didn’t like to go to the junkyard to practice the little decisions of destruction that a .22 rifle can provide a kid. But I couldn’t shoot anything one way or another if I didn’t have any bullets.
Yes, my sister, Barbara, and I had a wonderful time at the show. We found many dies that just had to come home with us. They did. They were screaming out our names as we walked by them in the Sweet Stamps' booth. Honestly. I'm not kidding. And stamps. Well, let's just say what idiot would go to a stamp show without buying stamps? Certainly not me. Ergo, I am not an idiot. Or, I am not an idiot who didn't buy stamps. Many stamps. Too many stamps. (Can you ever really have too many stamps? Inquiring minds want to know.)
8pm- Midnight
It is easy to engage them in conversation. A smile will do it. Or a small comment. They don’t flinch away. They don’t think you must be touched in the head to want to talk to them. Unlike many extremely old ladies in England, for example, they are not apologetic, self-deprecating creatures, accustomed to being overlooked or insulted. No woman is ever non-viable in Italy. She may at any age demonstrate self-respect, being elegantly shod and immaculately groomed, without accusations of being pecora dressed as agnello.
Then it turned out he never used a racial epithet in his 911 call.
So now, oh happy day!, when you see something that says "Sold Out", it means, actually, "Sold Out", but that we can get it in again.
The first in a vowel variant word sort. This activity has four beehives labeled with one of these spellings: oo, ew, ue, ou. Students will match the bees to the hives. Students then record responses on a provided recording sheet.
1. Blues As Blues Can Get (5:36)
ABV 5.5%
We have granted the first premise then. What about the second premise? This is where I have a hearty chuckle. Most of the time we are dealing with militant, sometimes even radical atheists or at least anti-Christians who have absolutely no rational justification for their own conceptions of what is right and wrong. These people are almost entirely products of the society that produced them, unconscious idea-sponges who in spite of their pretensions to the contrary have never had a critical or original thought in their lives. So how exactly do they “know” that slavery is wrong? When exactly was this hypothesis tested and verified by the scientific method? Where are the research papers and double-blind studies that establish the truth of this moral proposition?
Even though this requires leaving the dough to rise a couple of times, overall, it’s not too time consuming, and it bakes in minutes. Add whatever toppings strike your fancy – my favorite is to top it with thinly sliced antipasti vegetables (peppers, zucchini, onion, garlic) that I’ve lightly pan fried in olive oil – wow! Of course you can add the usual favorites – olives, corn, Bulgarian cheese, mushrooms, etc.
The only exercise I got in was when I walked home from work one day… just 1.48 miles but I really shouldn’t complain about that.
And is not shattered into dyes, 10
7 garlic cloves, minced
Chili-Glazed Tofu Over Asparagus and Rice was a new recipe, and a good one! I, of course, didn't follow the recipe as written . . . I pulled the asparagus component out of the rice pilaf, roasting it in the oven instead, and added red bell pepper and mushroom to the pilaf, per a suggestion someone made the comments section of the recipe. Kept the glaze on the tofu the same, though, which was excellent! I'll definitely make this again -- healthy and easy.
Thanks again Helen for the toffee bits! I'm going to make the recipe on the back of the package for oatmeal and toffee bit cookies...and bring you and the girls some!
Milagro Modern Mexican (20 Allen Avenue #130, Webster Groves) Milagro not only has the best beer list of any Mexican restaurant in St. Louis, but has one of the best lists period. Their traditional Mexican fare pairs up well with the large selection of hoppy beers that Milagro has to offer. Also make sure to check out their fantastic Sunday brunch.
Sallmén M, Lindbohm ML, Kyyrönen P, Nykyri E, Anttila A, Taskinen H, Hemminki K. Reduced fertility among women exposed to organic solvents. In: Book of Abstracts of the International Symposium on New Epidemics in Occupational Health; 1994 May 16-19; Helsinki. Helsinki: Finnish Institute of Occupational Health, 1994:76.
Depeche Mode – In Your Room
CLEAR showed up the day after the party, with only 12 votes.
Questions for you to ponder or respond to:
6And sware by him that liveth for ever and ever, who created heaven, and the things that therein are, and the earth, and the things that therein are, and the sea, and the things which are therein, that there should be time no longer:
Suspended yards above Thom Yorke, ten large lcd screens dangled from thin, black wiring. They flickered green static and images of all Yorke’s bandmates. The enormous screen behind them resembled a calm body of water. Radiohead was in the middle of playing “Reckoner”, their last song before two encore sets. As the song came to its close, Yorke bowed and exited the stage. The entire stadium of fans roared.
TERRORIST DOG ON THE LOOSE
My plan is to return once a week over the next month or so to see the changes in the plants leafing out and blooming. I'll be sure to take some of these same shots.
But there is a greater and more immediate danger: Even if Spain and Italy are fundamentally sound, there may not be two years to find out. The level of Greek interest rates shows that markets believe that Greece will default very soon. And even before that default occurs, interest rates on Spanish or Italian debt could rise sharply, putting these countries on a financially impossible path. The eurozone’s politicians may learn the hard way that trying to fool markets is a dangerous strategy.
It’s Not You, It’s Your Books
Join Us!
Wayne Mills the Quizmaster and originator of the Kids Lit Quiz was awarded the Member of the New Zealand Order of Merit in the Queen's New Year Honours list 2011.
# Once village utilities are in place camps may want to look further for ways to severe more links to the outside world. Learning from experts on etc, to become fully prepared to move from Wall Street to Wild Street.
B.singer: Russ
We were ushered through to the children’s ward very quickly, but there the good luck stopped. 3 hours later, after I’ve been surrounded by brats whose parents couldn’t control them and refused to cover their mouths when they coughed or sneezed, a moody doctor decided to look at my little ‘un. She has a nasty chest, throat and ear infection, got the drugs and was told to go home.
I wrote back, referring Gross to Mr. Williams' website, and asking again for the name of the contest, the names of the other judges, and documentation of his experience. I wasn't entirely surprised when I didn't hear back. In fact, I never heard from Gross again.
- can have the option of stay dry or natural fibers against the skin
and release from darkness for the prisoners,
And just because I want something on here that makes me happy, here are two pictures that make me smile:
Michael Musto — who has chronicled the lives of drag queens, club kids, and an array of freaks and celebrities for The Village Voice for 25 years — still turns heads.
Beastie Boys Sabotage US
YOU ARE / I AM Book & Postcard Exhibition
Don’t cha’ love. The little baby.
I remember reading that when the writer Tracey Chevalier had her first baby, someone told her that "every baby costs one book"; she said something to the effect that that seemed fair enough. But we should turn Connolly's equation upside-down and say that maybe what's in the pram – breathing, vulnerable life, hope, a present responsibility – is actually more important than good art. It might make us produce less art, but maybe it would be art with the future at its heart.
Never give up. We'll all get there together.
On the transport we've chopped,
XL: “Humorous, carefree, moody, weird and determined. Sounds like a great combination.”
Much has been made of Sullivan’s Midwestern roots—he is from Ohio River communities in Indiana and Kentucky and indeed, his voice is familiar to someone like me who has lived (somewhat pathetically) exclusively in Ohio. Generally speaking, I like essays like Sullivan’s. He’s a writer who can go anywhere, stand back a step, and ask the question, “What have we here?” Anyone can ask that question, I suppose, but he’s got the keen observational skills to get the right answer. And his best essays are those where he introduces his own perspective or connection to the topic.
Our home has a slab foundation, which means we sit on a block of concrete (and according to Mr. Sugarplum, also an ant hill). So there are no outlets or vents in the floor, only the walls and ceilings. The furniture in this room floats in the middle, away from the walls and subsequent outlets. And to make things even more difficult, there is only one accessible outlet.
The 3rd best team in each group are given a second chance in the Europa League. There, they’ll have the chance to bully other clubs. Most Europa League winners are clubs that weren’t good enough to qualify for the knockout phase of the Champions League.
Her pretty redhead
Sure, there’s been a lot of school work, but we’ve all had bits of free time in between. If we spent a bit of time now and then on this project, we could have had a chapter out by now!
1. The adult beverage laws are nonexistant loose. You can drink in the streets. Bars can serve 24/7. Coming from Austin, I was a little weirded out that people were walking around with open containers. "Wait, you can do that?" That makes for set ups like the St. Germain bar on a bike (see below) legal. You can ride around handing out drinks. Even though the laws are loose, one should practice common sense and do not over indulge.
After we got back to Chennai, my stomach went for a toss yet again. Part 2 of non-stop LMs! The bloody bug or whatever had not really left the first time I suppose. From there onwards it was just a continuous rush towards the family wedding. There were 2 functions/prayer ceremonies at home with lots of visiting relatives and my system once again slowly recovered with help from plenty of antibiotics and other meds. The wedding itself went fine but I had completely worn myself out by the end of it. The very next day after the wedding, I had to drop my wife off at the airport. She had to go to Mumbai to give an exam. As I returned home, I think my body had had enough and I felt extreme tiredness all of a sudden. Spent pretty much the whole day sleeping and found out later in the afternoon that I had contracted viral fever. On top of all that, in a few days we had to attend yet another wedding of a close family member. I barely recovered from the fever and somehow attended just about half of this other family wedding. By this time, both wife and I were thoroughly exhausted and wondering how a vacation had become so overwhelming.
This giveaway is open world wide.
Scientists and their bloody end time predictions. It has even attacked the mind of a football fan. It’s a joke though.
And there were lots of them today at the Wedding Expo at the Verizon Wireless Expo. Mom, my trusty roadie / wedding show helper handed out my brochures, chatted with the brides, generally charmed everyone while I played and played and played and played. And played some more.
The PRC sales assistant should be grateful that somebody actually spoke up and defended him. Singaporeans were asked by their own MP to ‘reflect’ on themselves instead. However no matter how angry Singaporeans are at Sun Xu, there is absolutely no reason for them to take it out on innocent parties.
“Well, fine then," said Rothmon after a long pause. "Taking these factors into account, and dividing the sum by the members of your group, I come to a total of 400 iron pieces for you. I hope it will suffice,” said Rothmon, taking out two leather pouches and placing them on the desk. Hormel was surprised to see so much money at one time. He’d never seen this amount before. He took the two pouches with a great show of gratitude and stuffed them into his vest.
Still it's there.
Anti-racist is a code word for anti-White.
1 beware
Mahjong is a very popular game among Chinese, it takes four to play together. People usually play at someone’s house because most of the time it involves money and it can go on and on for a long time. A friendly game of Mahjong can provide an opportunity for the elderly to passed their time as well as to gossip. I took this photo because it was the first time I saw it played outdoors in a park in China. Notice how these ladies came prepared!
Moses has received the ten commandments from God, goes back to his people, finds that in the meantime they have become apostate, now worshiping the golden calf as their god, gets mad at them, and smashes the two tablets containing the ten commandments. The people are unworthy to receive God’s word, so Moses makes sure they can’t.
It’s never good to defy your team and teammates at any time, but during such a pivotal point in a series that could end your run at the Stanley Cup is NOT the best time to drink your cares away (especially when there’s a game the next day).
Those who know the Desert Eagle as the behemoth .50 caliber that has mule-kick recoil might be a little taken aback to see the name inscribed on a micro gun. The Micro Desert Eagle was originally designed so small that it was not legal to bring it into the U.S. (designed and manufactured in Europe). According to this guns.com article, the rights were bought by Magnum Research, which made some changes to the design so that it could be legally acquired in the states.
I remember it so vividly.
Those particles bounce
for the formation of the Bruckner Society in Leipzig during
This afternoon he was on his way through the city to the second hand bookshop which his daughter runs, but which he started himself in the 1980's after his retirement. A thoroughly charming man to meet.
So, that's it for another week. I'm off out to play this afternoon, helping at a local Craft Fayre. Please note the emphasis on 'helping' - the one and only time I had a stall there I made less than £3 all afternoon :( And I spent that anyhow on cupcakes and other stuff!
And so it comes down to Anthony Kennedy. Perhaps he will feel some small pull of humility, and not demolish Obama-Romneycare in one fell swoop. This is, however, the man who in one breath noted that while there was no data measuring it, he was on safe ground in saying that some women later come to regret their choice to abort a child, so humility may not be a governing principle at play.
Those that remain at the club are focussing on finishing the season by winning the remaining games. All the while the original Franchise FC – credit to the AISA History booklets by Tony Attwood and Andy Kelly for observing that Chelsea were formed specifically to play in the Football League and have no history prior to this – are in the Champions League, third place is the only position that guarantees Champions League football; it would be a tense night for the fourth placed side were Chelsea to continue with their recent run of good form in the Camp Nou.
3. See my Political-Philosophic Letter of Nov. 28, 1983: “Counter-Revolution and Revolution: Grenada, the Caribbean Today, and the Challenge from Thirty Years of Movements from Practice That Were Themselves Forms of Theory,” available from News & Letters.
The weather forecast was possible showers for both days, but turned out pretty perfect. Saturday was mostly sunny and 25, with some rain after dinner when we were in our room. Sunday was a little overcast and we got about 6 drops of rain on us at one lookout. It got to about 21.
Most owners, Quintanilla said, were never contacted about where their vehicles were — a violation of state law. By the time some found out, the towing and storage fees were too high for them to claim the vehicles, he said.
Wide-spread and plentiful in much of South The united states, the presented American starling is perhaps and problematically the most successful chicken on there are. Often recognized as daring, this chicken is actually pretty careful and can be challenging to strategy. Poly­typic. Length 8.7" (22 cm).
Western art has been so much influenced by Mediterranean cultures, and by the Renaissance – and so relatively little by, let’s say, the bracing floes of the North Sea and the Baltic. William Morris and several of the pre-Raphaelites, yes. Wagner, yes. Tolkien, yes. T. H. White, I suppose. Auden himself. Who else – of the first water? Very soon one’s having to scrape around. And yet, we British are of the north-west European world. It’s in our bloodstream, our nervous system, our language, our laws, our landscape, our stories… And so, for obvious and subtle reasons, the myths, legends and sagas are likely to speak to us.
TLD: Would you say this is a girly record through and through?
I’m not sure what i’m asking here, maybe; does anyone else ever feel like this? What does it seem like from an objective point of view? And, how do I go about getting a clear answer to what is going on?
“Create” and “Outline” seem worlds apart. But if you just write “from the seat of your pants” your memoir will be all over the place. Just remember that whatever you put in this outline may not be what you end up with. Keep an open mind for change because as you write your memoir, things will change – perhaps your perspective, perhaps due to family flak, perhaps boredom on your part. Consider your outline a “work-in-progress.”
"Please stop"
"What? You mean when he dances around and makes funny noises?"
she climbed into my lap.
rx 16:07
I got up. He told me to go to the bedroom.
Mad that most foreign food items could possibly be banned from grocery stores as of June 1, some foreigners in Argentina are planning a protest to show how they feel about being left without their favorite brands of ketchup and potato chips.
The winner of the Country Bob's All Purpose Sauce has been drawn and emailed. Random.org picked # 30....
When I find a paper I love, I want to use every little scrap of it. Here you can see three ways to use one sheet of paper. Pick your card based on whatever scrap you have available.
15. If you kiss me, I promise to stop bugging you.
A volcano WITH lava and dinasaurs cake
We've already discussed my love for all things buffalo, but I haven't mentioned my love for Pinterest. I have tons and tons of recipes pinned to try, some simple, some super complex, but all delicious. The highly addicting Pinterest is what first turned me on to these buffalo egg rolls (Can You Stay For Dinner's Buffalo Chicken Rolls) which are pretty dag-gone good. According to the recipe these should be baked (not fried). Because I have only deep fried anything once (and it was a complete disaster) and because I really try not eat fried things excessively, I also baked them. Here's the caveat, they were good baked, but they'd be phenomenal fried. So, if you have the time, skill, and inclination, give them a try that way too. By the way, when you're looking for egg roll wrappers, they are generally in the produce section near the refrigerated salad dressings.
"Dear Jesus,
Los Angeles Daily News
So I can enjoy your
IN THE NORTH LANDS
Although younger women now tend to adopt more western styles of clothing, before venturing into town the older ladies of Suva will don that quintessentially Fijian garment, the sulu, an ankle length cotton, or sometimes silk underskirt, which is worn beneath a more conventional knee length dress. Sometimes, with a final touch of South seas charm, the costume will often be enhanced by a hibiscus, the Fijian national flower, often worn behind the ear. Many Fijian men also often wear sulus , however, the male version extends only to the knee and is usually worn with sandals. The result is surprisingly smart and, as with the Scottish kilt, any unwise comment regarding a man in a skirt could well elicit an unwelcome response from a burly Fijian soldier, policeman or rugby player.
Until my dad prepared for church, (T’was a Sunday morning). Now he left us because he was going to church and we were not yet done preparing. So, we just travelled by taxi, with my uncle.
So, where are we? Oh yeah, the airplane doesn't have the range, Vin is stuck in Delhi waiting on a flight that's gonna be at least 2 hours late, our overflight clearances are all for Friday and we're rapidly running out of Fridayness.
* SYSTEM SPECIFICATION FILE
Fin somewhere to be private in a public space.
Now comes the hard part- fixing it all up! Something I've always wanted to do and never had the chance. I love make overs and now I'm ready to begin mine.
When you search in your WordPress blog, your search results are listed chronologically. Not by “most likely”, “most popular”, “most frequent use of the phrase”, or even alphabetically, just by date. And the chronological order runs from most recent to oldest. If the most likely post to provide the information the user is searching for is older, they will have to scroll towards the end of the list to find the most likely candidate for information. What are the odds they will, huh? This frustrates me no end.
Brii of Brigg is Home will be hosting next week's gallery #30. Please send your 500 pixels wide images to her (briiblog AT gmail DOT com) from now through Monday 6:00 p.m. New York time. And please be sure to link to Brii as well as myself in your post.
Justin Bieber, Carrie Underwood, Cee Lo Green, LMFAO, The Wanted, Usher, Kelly Clarkson, Linkin Park and Nelly Furtado.
I choose thoughts that nurture my mind;
~ Whisk egg white and cream of tartar until forms soft peak, add in sugar gradually and beat at high speed until stiff peak forms.
Remove the carrot puree from the refrigerator and allow to come to room temperature. Prepare and cool crust. Fold in about 2/3 of the marshmallow creme into the carrot puree until completely incorporated. Now fold in the whipped cream until no streaks of white remain. Divide among prepared crusts. Refrigerate until set, about 2 hours.
It’s also better to take photos of several people in successive order than to line them up in a row, as in this photo of three ladies at the quilt. (That’s my mother nearest the camera and she made that quilt for me, which I cherish very, very much.)
I don't know why they think that stones that have lasted 10,000 years will suddenly break down with people touching them.
Without Rondo, the Celtics were 6-6-1 with totals. On the road without him, Boston was 4-1-1 Over and in the games it was an underdog, it was 3-2-1 Over.
What are your plans once the new album is released (other solo projects, tours, workshops etc)?
It doesn’t really matter what the situation is, a choice has to be made and choices have consequences. Do you always make good choices? No, so why should your character? Do you ever do something out of character? Yes? So why can’t your character? When I started writing the female protagonist in my book – she’s called Jennifer by the way, Jen to everyone bar her dad – I stuck her in situations and got her to do things: go here, pick up that, put it down. I treated her a bit like a character out of The Sims. She didn’t have much of a personality. I’m not saying she had no personality just not a well-developed one.
Hartung then goes on to talk about how he believes the government should be providing help to innovative companies in the form of R & D subsidies, grants and tax breaks, I agree with the last – not the first two proposals.
WIP = Wishful Internet Perusal: Like many of us, I spend a lot of time on the web looking at all the pretty yarns. I love 99.999% of what I see, but know I'm never going to get even 00.001%. When I just can't take it anymore, I get out of the house ...
the valiant spirit shields. I know my name,and that is so sweet.
she was always pushed around
And he seemed OK.
"Dead is Lon
I’ll keep you posted.
"There is a big portuguese influence in Malaysian and Singaporean curries thanks to the hordes that migrated decades ago. The curries are now Portuguese influence or Eurasian Influenced (which is my heritage). So in some restaurants they will have vindaloos with beef (as Indian ones can't be done with beef) or other curries like Devil Curry, Prawn and Pineapple Curry etc..... which is all part of the Portugues OR
VENUS IN FURS
May is Cystic Fibrosis Awareness month. I had originally planned to write a blog about the nature of CF and what is being done to help. But I think I've done a lot of that through many of my blog posts, so I ended up straying to an entirely different topic keeping with the tune of my last post, still related to cystic fibrosis awareness. Sometimes, you gotta be honest with the cold hard truth, CF sucks and something needs to be done.
Like so many of his books, “1Q84” addresses loneliness and disconnect and the redemption provided by unconditional love. Usually I find this element in his books to be very beautiful and pure, but for whatever reason this element in this book was largely a source of frustration with the characters. For the larger part of the first section there is little mention of a link between the two characters and their separate narratives.
For 4 servings
1 infringement
What is Up With This
After a yummy breakfast, I was showered with handmade cards and gifts galore. That pregnant belly Kerri had in Brownies was actually a hand made pillow! And Kerri even wrote me a poem. And then the neighbor girls snuck in to wish me a happy day. Best Mother's Day ever.
What choice do us average ordinary folks have. We want the best for our children, but all too often others are telling us what is best because somehow they know better. Don't get me wrong. Sometimes they do know better, but in this day in age it is just easier for the "those who know" just to tell us what to do, rather than engage in an open discussion to create a holistic solution.
I've tried posting a few times and I've gotten all sorts of error messages.
The quality of my listening sure varies, I locked out my father yesterday because I did not hear; he had just stepped outside to roll up the hose. Despite that I again have congestion behind my left eardrum, last night in class, I think that I actually listened well, I was not tired, but became hot and thirsty.
I was proudly wearing my rucksack on a long walk recently, when one of my bipeds told me how clever I was and I remembered the day my first rucksack arrived. I always keep an eye on what arrives in the post. There isn’t often anything of interest, but you never know your luck – occasionally there’s something nice.
And while it is true…there is deep pain and anguish when our dreams are crushed, like David…we ought to find a place for God not necessary to revive our dreams, but rather to WORSHIP… to thank Him for what we had or hoped to have; to find hope for the next season; to ask for courage to deal with our present and forget the past; to gather the broken pieces and redeem what we can and dispose what we cannot. WORSHIP…makes us understand the heart of God…in the matter and allowing Him to shape and birth NEW DREAMS in our hearts. David lost a son, but he gained a son who GOD LOVED!
As I sat here watching a movie I realized that I have some sympathy for the villain. I seemed to have some understanding on why they are the creature that they are. Watching as situations unfold that cause them to slowly crack before your eyes. You sit there justifying their actions while totally putting aside the fact that they were a bit unhinged to begin with. In the end you have justified their revenge and unwittingly become one of their supporters.
I am so lost
So that means create a card using black & white and only one other WOW color!!!
Hi everyone. I hope everyone had a wonderful holiday weekend. I had two Thanksgiving hangovers....so full I couldn't move the next day. But boy was the food good! Today we're putting up the Christmas tree, trains, and decorations, have you started?
Ok, so there appears to be a great deal of consternation in Big Blue Nation about vitriol hurled at the University of Kentucky and its National Championship basketball team regarding them being honored at tomorrow’s Cincinnati Reds game in Great American Ballpark. Lance McAlister of WLAP sister station ESPN 1530 in the Queen City reprinted comments posted on the Reds official Facebook page as part of his blog. Click on the link there and scroll down to the UK logo to see the ugliness. You can also see the entire thread here, but Lance hit the highlights.
Sale by auction is regarded as being a relatively transparent way to sell property particularly if there is no reserve. It is true that the auctioning business has given us terms like “shill” and “bid shielding” which remind us that perfect transparency might be unattainable but auctions still enjoy relative confidence. An auction can also maximise a sale price as buyers can bid and re-bid to secure the property, and potential buyers can see what other bidders are bidding. On the other hand, you need to be a savvy buyer to bid at auctions because bids are final and any defect in the property needs be considered before making a bid. All in all though, auctions are a decent way to sell property generally when seeking to get the best price and demonstrate transparency.
When Billy Peltzer is given a small creature called a Mogwai by his father, he is unaware of the carnage he is about to encounter. There is a huge responsibility in looking after Gizmo as there are certain rules which must be followed. The Mogwai must be kept away from bright light, never made wet and never, ever be fed after midnight. When an accident occurs involving Gizmo and water, the next evolution stage of the Mogwai appears, and it isn’t nice at all.
Here are some of the "little things" that have put a smile on may face in the last week or so...
I chose to confide in many other people along the way as the decision to divorce was made final. My sister and I just aren’t that close. We talk maybe once a month and its always very top line. I just don’t choose her to vent or tell my shit. I have others for that. She was upset because she has chosen to turn to me in the past about her biggest problems. I admit I didn’t consider that at the time we got angry with each other when I told her about the divorce. I shocked her and she was upset about that, but in hindsight more so that I didn’t choose her to confide in during the tough times. Understandable I guess. But I have way more friends and support vehicles than she does. She gets that now.
* A mother's love is patient and forgiving when all others are forsaking, it never fails or falters, even though the heart is breaking ~ Helen Rice
Breaststroke can also be swum with the dolphin kick in butterfly.
Dear John,
I miss our quiet time together. You on the couch with a book. The dogs snugged up against you. A cup of tea in your hand, your index finger through the cup handle, the rest around the base holding it. You could sit still but your hands fidgeted.
28. Kiss me if I am wrong, but you want to go out with me, don’t you…
God knows what we need even before we ask Him, so I’ve been taught. That being the case, maybe I should see to it that I love liberty more passionately. I’ll add a grain of pure courage to my morning coffee, and I will try to think more independently, and step away from the party lines. I’ll see if I can live my Christianity in a more honest way. All that would make for a lovely Christmas, and
- Pack your virtual briefcase with valuable information assets
“You want to run your hillbilly heroin fiefdom up here, that’s between you and the great state of Kentucky. I got no interest in shitkicker-on-shitkicker crime. But you will not drag me into this. The next time you set up any operation in this county or anywhere else it better not have my god damn family name on the deed or so help me God, I will lose this star and the dance we do subsequent to that will not end with you finding Jesus in a hospital bed.”
Tanner is having a blast and getting worn out by Corbs who runs up to him and scares him forcing Tanner to run ahead. I may have lost them forever! But, the kids are (they are currently out there somewhere) begging for McDonalds. Civilization!
Me: So you’re basically saying that if we all stopped being insulted by racist connotations, there wouldn’t be any problems. (Oh god why did I say that?)
In preparation for the webinar, please download the PDF handout version from the right-hand side of the web page for this webinar at http://www.schoolsmovingup.net/webinars/onlinepd3
Emily Bays – SIT South Africa: Multiculturalism & Human Rights
JPG: I don't know if I fully agree that you always enter Game 3 in pursuit of an unrelated goal - unless you count the "spirit maps" sold by Keith, which are totally tangential. The goal of the Other World sequences, by and large, is to collect clues (the key flags), which York then mentally assembles in the profiling cutscenes, which lead to story cutscenes. So in that sense Game 3 transitions right into Game 2. (You could even argue that Game 1 makes its presence felt in Game 3 via the conveniently-placed rooms where York can sleep, eat, shave, change, etc.)
Meanwhile, from time to time a real case of voter fraud shows up. I have yet to find one that could have been prevented by voter identification laws.
Environmental hazards like mercury pollution, high energy costs, low lumen output and inconsistent, uneven coverage are just a few of the associations with most lighting installations found in commercial settings today… (more)
I'm joining these special parties.
Finally! L.A's famed Drybar is opening in New York tomorrow! The salon offers $40 blowouts—it doesn't matter what length your hair is or if you curl it or flat iron it—it's still gonna be $40.
Admittedly, some things have changed since I moved to Hawaii over 20 years ago. Local grocery stores such as Safeway and Times Market carry traditional Passover foods such as Matzah and gefiltah fish, even in Kapolei.
After the party was done and the boys were finally finished playing video games we headed home. Spencer kept saying things like, “That was just the best idea ever!” and "That was just perfect!" Even though Spencer turned 30, I feel like he is a 10 year old at heart. He loved seeing his family and being able to play video games with his brothers.
All records as of Friday, March 9
OL: Will Blackwell, LSU
Hello everyone and welcome to my new lovely new followers, lovely to meet you :-)
I feel compelled to mention here that I only read the L.O.T.R. saga when the first movie was due to come out. Of course I loved all the books, but there were times when I found myself yelling, “Stop singing already and just get up the damn mountain!” I don’t know what that means now and I’m afraid to read them again, so we’ll just assume I had a reason for yelling such things at the books.
To avoid participating on that day’s activities, Auta travelled to India. The said NJC meeting was chaired by Justice Moses.A. Bello, the president of the Customary Court of Appeal. Curiously, lawyers who were members of the council were barred from the meeting because it involved disciplinary action against a judge.
the quiet agony of loss
A view from inside
She's fearfully and wonderfully made and she is Loved and Cherished by the CREATOR! He isn't bound to following the rules of our feeble attempts to put a name to what happens inside our minds and bodies.
Sometimes they could obtain pork, which made them feel quite special.
You say: “I do not consent to a search”
One tidbit I can tell you is that I am officially part of the copic blog team....what does that mean....well it just means you will continue to see copic techniques on my blog...like today!
I also talk about the process of writing. Children enjoy discovering I was first published at age 13. For younger audiences, I juggle star-shaped beanbags to illustrate the importance of reading—once I explain I learned to juggle—by reading a book.
With the senior staff all gathered in my Ready Room, we are all assembled for the most important meeting of the year. To discuss plans for the Enterprise Christmas Party.
I sewed the pink felt to the brown felt with a fine blanket stitch, leaving at this stage the top end of the pink felt open, so I could place a miraculous medal and St Benedict medal inside.
Yet there is a danger in letting that time get away from me. I know because I've done it in the past.
Christmas cards and I are not getting along this year. To be quite honest, Christmas has kind of appeared out of thin air this year. No one on the outside would think that. I mean...Our tree is up, the outside is decorated, all of my shopping is done. BUT in reality, the tree and outside lights would not be done if not for the kiddos, daddy and Dada. I lost the stockings, and I have not found them yet. The way it looks, we will be giving stocking stuffers from a Kroger bag!
I was also learning to trust her and her me. I have to trust her. Her back is taller than I am and I was sitting up there. At one point I did adjust my leg, my right leg was not in position like it should be. I lifted my foot up and out to the side. Doing so, the stirrup leather 'popped' out from between the billets and slapped the saddle flap. She jumped forward, crowhopped twice and stopped again. "I told her that was unexpected and uncalled for." That was that. We trotted around a bit more, went the other direction and called it good.
Name a book that made you cry (or came close to getting you there).
Even for my standards of cheese-loving - this seems high, no?
The Sparrows also like to take up residence in the rain gutter over our back porch, which requires the Husband get up on the roof to vacate them. I of course insist on two things. That he doesn’t fall and break his neck, well three things really, that if he does fall he dies cause we have no health insurance and can’t afford to care for his injuries, and finally that he waits until the little chicks have flown the coop. He agrees of course because I’m the chick that rules the roost.
All You: All You magazine (available at Walmart or via subscription). Manufacturer coupons.
security of all nuclear materials
WISHLIST: I used my friend's Kindle last weekend and surprised myself by how much I liked it. I thought I would be staunchly against reading off an e-reader, but it was so light and compact and the electronic pages looked just like book pages. I'm intrigued. Any of you have a Kindle or other e-Reader? What do you think?
For though, in the same year that Frederick adopted the second of his regal prepositions, his fellow Prussian Johann Gottfried Herder wrote his Treatise on the Origin of Language, a landmark for the history of cultural nationalism in general and German nationalism in particular, Frederick continued not only to write in French, but to disparage the German language. It was, he wrote in his 1780 De la littérature allemande, a semi-barbaric language (‘à demi-barbare’). His model rather was the French of Voltaire, just as his model for courtly life had been that of Versailles (minus the women). Indeed, in 1775 – as Tim Blanning has pointed out, only one year before the publication of The Sorrows of Young Werther – Frederick wrote to Voltaire that Germany’s level of cultural attainment lagged about two-and-a-half centuries behind that of France. German opera was even worse than that German literature, the Shakespeare-admiring Goethe included (Götz von Berlichingen an ‘abominable imitation’ of the Englishman), disdained by our Classically-inclined monarch. He declared that he would rather listen to the neighing of his horse than to a German soprano, though the example in the 1770s of Gertrud Elisabeth Mara seems somewhat to have softened his attitude. If so many of his intellectual influences – which is not necessarily to say his militaristic practice as a ruler – were to be found in the French Enlightenment, the King looked to Italy in matters operatic, a prejudice, be it noted, as common amongst singers as amongst singers. Gottlob Stephanie, libretto reviser for Die Entführung, and who had himself been conscripted into Frederick’s army during the Seven Years’ War, would bewail even in 1792, in a preface to his collected Singspiel texts, that not only were there too few original German operas but that singers were far readier to sing texts written in the Romance (‘welsch’, a word featuring in Hans Sachs’s Meistersinger peroration) tongues of French and Italian.
I wonder if there is anyone still out there, reading.....i hope so...Say hi if you are there :-)
I went back to work and found out on the day of my return that I was being made redundant. All I could think was, WTF! Why? Business is booming and the staff were struggling as it is. Their excuse was they were having role reshuffles and decided that I was no longer needed. Of course this had nothing to do with them getting annoyed as I had to keep going off for tests and couldn’t work in the warehouse anymore because of my disability or pregnancy. Yeah right! I was let go towards the end of February and since then they’ve been advertising for more and more staff, including for the role I was doing. I don’t feel pity towards them that I’ve been told that things have gone on a downhill spiral for them since I left, I feel good about that. I hope that doesn’t make a bad person, but after what they did to me I can’t help it.
Possible names-
“The temperature was 67 degrees on the thermometer in my car, and it was drizzling a little bit,” Sheppard said. “The course was firm but in excellent condition.”
Hello everyone and welcome back to the Paper Shelter Challenges. A big thank you to our players from last challenge. There were some lovely entries this week too, just like every other week.
RBS still has two more years of “heavy lifting, significant clean-up costs and vulnerability to outside events” as it restructures its business, Hester said.
L-7
Me: Wouldn't that be cool? If you had a hinge on your balls? You could move them like this.
“The veterans are the true heroes,” Gordon said. “They are the warriors fighting the real battle overseas, while we do it here for fun. Gordon said he’d be at the Aug 4 event, “carrying some bricks.”
MAKE THE MOST OF YOUR HD ENTERTAINMENT.
i mean, seriously, look at what he looks like upon waking in the morning.
I want to point out that I gave it 3 stars, so I did like it- I just didn't love it the way I'd hoped. I really need to stop going into books with expectations, but I couldn't help it.
Thank you for coming here, visiting me and for
Even before the consolidation of all islands into one state, Pila, was believed to be a thriving settlement. Excavations in the 60′s had proven this. The town is proud to have saved this part of their history. The old Escuela Pia at the left side of the church, now house some of the most important archeological finds in Pila.
For if you were truly sorry
Wishing everyone
Jeremy’s looks of disapproval gave me life.
Indeed I know I couldn't cope
What genre or genres do you write?
It's not a deep game by any means; it is a bizarre one, though, and one that's very much a product of its time.
Cass and I pull some more outfits. Mark takes off his pants as he changes cameras, Talluhlah says "you getting naked Mark? Ooooh" and Mark says, "I'm hot! Don't embarrass me!" which is cute cause I never see Mark get shy, he slips into his shorts.
5. Get up to get snack.
The weather was lovely, friends stopped by and there are Reese's Peanut Butter Cups leftover.
It turns out (thank you Wikipedia) that there have been 43 guys who at some point or another were presidents of you know where. Out of these 43 guys, 20 of them had names unique unto themselves. And it would be 22, or more than half, if Thomas Jefferson and Woodrow Wilson weren't both named Thomas.
The Yamaha FZ6 Complete Race Exhaust System fits model years from 2009 to the present.
Little wonder, then, that the West Bank is also hemorrhaging Christians. Once 15% of the population, they now make up less than 2%. Some have attributed the flight to Israeli policies that allegedly deny Christians economic opportunities, stunt demographic growth, and impede access to the holy sites of Jerusalem. In fact, most West Bank Christians live in cities such as Nablus, Jericho and Ramallah, which are under Palestinian Authority control. All those cities have experienced marked economic growth and sharp population increase—among Muslims.
The old man looked up at the gunslinger and said, "No, I never did dance... never really wanted to."
27. In terms of exercise, what, if anything, are you currently doing?
Now, when I say Mary Sue Self Insert Fic, the fannish among you are probably already running for the hills. In the days of The Lord of the Rings fandom’s film boost, stories about perfect American girls getting into the movies and making out with Legolas were a dime a dozen. But Guy Andrews—as much as I hate to be gender essentialist, I’m still flummoxed that a man wrote this—takes this tired concept and breathes new life into it by actually following it through. Amanda Price, while not as rounded as I like my characters and is, of course, underappreciated by the people in her real life, is still a fairly regular girl. While she can’t exactly come out and tell Bingley and Darcy where she’s from, she’s extremely aware of the influence Pride and Prejudice has had on her life; Amanda’s been in love with Darcy since she was twelve. I do have to call shenanigans, however, on the fact that Amanda seems to not be aware that Jane Austen wrote anything else. She has to learn to fit in and play the games of society in order to survive—Mrs. Bennet eventually turns Amanda out of the house, disgusted with the effect she’s having on the young Misses Bennet. While the ending is still straight out of a classic Mary Sue Self Insert Fic, there’s some thought behind it, and the characters have to earn their ending, no matter how ridiculous it is. How ridiculous, you might ask? Amanda makes Darcy reenact the famous wet shirt scene from the 1995 Pride and Prejudice. Yes, really.
Catherine is not an angel either, she is just as selfish and self-centered as Heathcliff is. They both feel superior to all other people and think if they hurt other people it is justified, because all others are weak sheep. The reason they have for loving each other so much is that they are so much alike, and it so they just love another side of themselves that they see in the other person.
Carl John Bedigian, 35, New York, N.Y.
They regularly nests east of the Mississippi River in North America.
Marking your property is one of the most simple and effective ways of protecting your possessions. Personally I prefer your drivers license number. Be sure to identify the number you use as to
We were living in peace in our thatch huts. The 10 piece of cattle were grazing under the African sky. The head of the family sat in the shade of a tree drinking beer, the wives were working the land and the kids were making clay oxen to play with.
My story "The Judgment of Jean Lafitte" would be a lot better if it, too, were illustrated by Reed Crandall, but I hope you'll like it anyway. It's HERE, in ACTION: Pulse Pounding Tales Vol. 1.
Never pay money to join a cult, and certainly not on a whim. I guess don’t join one for free either, even if they promise cookies. Especially if they promise cookies. The expression ‘Drink the Kool-Aid’ exists for a reason. How do you think they got so many people? Arrow signs. I’m telling you, look it up. No don’t. Lifestyle changes should be discussed with your wife / husband / family / brain before you just proceed on an impulse. Same for those Timeshare deals, which are rather cult-ish. Just give me my free gift and take me back to the strip, and no, Steve, I don’t care how often you went skiing last year.
Here is another indicator that I have found to be quite reliable. The cumulative advance/decline line of the Russell 2000. Once again I am using a 3 week exponential moving average here. When it begins to hook to the upside that is generally a pretty good sign of a bottom. Note that it turned down in late-July 2011, up in early-October 2011, up again in late-December 2011, and turned down again in February 2012. I suspect that when this begins to turn up again the market will likely be at an important low.
Obviously it's almost impossible to describe these earrings without using ths S-word.
The success of education in general, and perhaps English more than any other subject, is dependent on so many factors. Most subjects go beyond the classroom and are affected by home environment, parental expectation, and socio-economic factors. With all these influences, it makes it very difficult to accurately assess the impact of any individual classroom method over another.
About four weeks ago Patty and Chris, quite possibly the cutest couple of the century, came to visit New York. Over milkshakes I told tales of my summer of love (well, perhaps my love of summer) and the quest and challenge I was facing. Immediately, the two turned towards one another. "Dan?" they said. After scrolling through facebook pictures and learning he was a foodie in advertising with a sense of adventure, well, what more possibly needs to be said?
I guess if you're going to leave your mark, scar tissue's as good a way as any.
I was born with ten fingers and toes.
Ahhh...the wonders of "togetherness" that comes around when baking is imvolved! :) Pure joy!
1 small to medium cabbage
But louder than all of this has been my housing situation. My ongoing, epic battle with Bank of America is what nightmares are made of. If you dream of smarmy, mean lawyers and a corporation that can’t function efficiently, at least. As a parent, it’s always your biggest priority to provide protection and a roof over your children’s heads, so for that to be in a constant state of upheaval has taken its toll on me.
For once, it looks like the Democrats voted the right way, while the Republicans are happy to see our privacy and our freedom of speech and thought destroyed. Whatever happened to the 'small government' Republicans?
What Are You Reading, is where we gather to share what we have read this past week and what we plan to read this week. It is a great way to network with other bloggers, see some wonderful blogs, and put new titles on your reading list.
Matter of fact, my history with bars is shaky at best. Until I find a new distraction I'm going to write about my various experiences in bars. I'm not going to follow a chronological order but a rambling one as I see fit though I'll start by saying the first ever bars I entered was as but a young child.
The Wall Street Journal reported last year on one judge in West Virginia who approved 99.7 percent of his disability claims cases, while the national average is about 60 percent. That judge, David B. Daugherty, resigned soon after the article appeared.
Don't judge its my first video my reps may be a little off. The camera made me nervous! Also the sign that may be hard to read says modifications where I than regress some of the exercises to make them a little easier for beginners.
lessons learned
Second, he notes the opposite impulse at work, the “Benedict option”—a new monasticism that does not seek engagement with culture but rather the formation of counter-cultural communities that “stand apart . . . and inspire by example rather than by engagement.” Douthat suggests that these first two measures should not be seen as completely opposed and, indeed, could benefit by being paired with one another, otherwise engaging the culture can become accommodation and being an example can become separatism and sectarianism.
This weekend, for just a snip at £250,000, conservative party treasurer Peter Cullas, is offering a table at London’s Most exclusive brasserie. For what is a mere poultry sum you can enjoy Downing Street at it’s best.
Dear Readers: Being an environmental health and safety professional, I am often called to assist companies preparing for agency inspections. It is a very stressful time, as my clients strive to come into full compliance with arcane requirements and regulatory minutia that seems to have no bearing on science or common sense. However, all of my clients work hard to create the healthiest environment and safest work place possible. So, the Goddess of Flaming Capitalism is in a rage today over the tactless, soulless, vile words of an EPA bureaucrat: Exciting new EPA enforcement method revealed: Single out a few offenders and crucify them
only 3 days to go till the website is regenerating.
I'm the gentle girl who loves random things. I dance. I write. I'm quite musically inclined too. I love to dream. I write my very detailed dreams in my special little notebook. I would love to travel in different places. I've been always interested in studying different languages and cultures. I memorize lines from my favorite movies. I cannot imagine myself doing one particular thing, probably be doing 3 or more different things. I'm currently taking up my Bachelor's Degree in Hotel, Restaurant and Institution Management in University of The Philippines, Diliman. So I hope those of you who will be reading my journals would be inspired the same way I was inspired in writing them.
I have Google. I went from having a Mother to relying on Google. PATHETIC.
Shedding light on the subsidy budget for 2012, the minister stated that the amount was arrived at after extensive consultations with the Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation and the Petroleum Products Pricing Regulatory Agency.
Me: “Who is doing all of this.”
2. Country your from?
Already I am thinking about the next steps. For diaries, digitization questions hinge more on what to scan than complex scanning issues. The items in the diaries include newspaper clippings, paper and stamps. There are some interesting storage considerations. Finally the fun part! There are many different ways that people have shared diaries - publish (online or in print) or only share with family? annotate transcriptions or not? print or not? complete or partial transcription?
3 surface
Armored with daggers strapped to their forelegs, and razor spiked plating, the dragons reach for the sky, destroying the bloated hive queens that hover in the sky.
May the receiving of your Body and Blood,
“Here at domtom our mission is to offer a new and innovative approach to the traditional methods of getting a book to print, breaking free from the restrictive practices often found in the publishing world.”
With those out of the way, my main beef is this: there seems to be a growing view that if there isn't definite, written, primary source proof of something, than we cannot assert that it is true in an historical context, and we shouldn't be saying it.
The following concerns a question in a physics degree exam at the University of Copenhagen :-
Four friends, recent college graduates, caught in a terrible job market, joke about turning to kidnapping to survive. And then, suddenly, it's no joke. For two years, the strategy they devise-quick, efficient, low risk-works like a charm. Until they kidnap the wrong man.
So you know I don't usually talk about my personal life on here. Sometimes it happens, but for the most part, my life is boring. Amidst cleaning my house and wiping bums, I come on the internet, check out blogger and facebook, and work on my novel.
So the world is falling apart, the global economy is in freefall and recession looms - but we can always frock up and make ourselves feel better. If we're going to go down, we might as well do it stylishly.
67. If beauty were measured in seconds, you’d be an hour!
I have been through layoff before. I have been one of the ones cut in both of those.
The toy guitars sold very well, and it didn’t take long before the makers of traditional insturments took notice. They started making kids guitars themselves. These were of a much higher quality than toy guitars, but they were also less expensive than their full-sized adult counterparts. While not all parents could afford them, it did allow real guitars to get into the hands of more kids than before.
11 Hideaway
The British Association for Adoption & Fostering (BAAF)
We meet up with the girls while they are on the run. They are in high school in Portland when they are found by guardians from their former school St. Vladimir’s Academy. And there is where we meet Dimitri Belikov, a young Russian guardian who is assigned to Lissa for protections, since Lissa is the last of her family and member of the one of the twelve royal families. The guardians bring back the girls to school and Rose is being punished for endangering Lissa by taking her of school grounds for almost 2 years. Because Rose didn’t train for during the years on the run she has to do extra training and being grounded for the rest of the year. Her trainer is Dimitri.
Oupa and Ouma were married in 1932. He was a bookkeeper from Prince Albert, she was secretary to the town lawyer in Humansdorp, Mr. Jones. Oupa walked past Ouma on the street one day and said: "That's the girl I'm going to marry."
9:21 - All the candidates are asked to define themselves in just one word. Paul: "Consistent." Santorum: "Courage." Romney: "Resolute." Gingrich: "Cheerful."
With appreciation,
July 12 Washington DC Verizon Center
I laughed. I know I’m corny and that question does sound like something I would say, except I would continue and ask that you sit down and tell me all about it. “Why does your heart feel like that? What brought on these deep emotions? What lesson did you learn from it?” I am sure, by what my friend was mimicking, I must sound like a bubbling idiot at times. But that’s alright! I make no excuses or apologize for who I am. She knows me better than anyone. To see myself through her eyes is always hysterical.
In 1997 when we bought our beach house,
So that being said (I will do my best to give you measurements) the key to Crostini is to make this a day ahead of time as the garlic and richness and the schmaltz (for all my Jewish friends) melds into a creamy goodness! I make there for holidays and it being Easter you get a gift from me.
-google ad sense
I am excited because despite "Blogger" being an available "Share" option for Sound Cloud you couldn't share...there was always some weirdo error message that would come up and the blog just wouldn't happen...
A man collapses speechless at the altar before he can say ‘I do’ but his symptoms miraculously clear up in House’s presence at the end of a sharp pointy needle. House team take it in turns to ask their boss out for the evening while House attempts to get Taub back into his marriage.
The epitaph on this stone, “We shall sleep, but not forever” is the title and first line of a Christian hymn that appeared in print in the late 19th century. The lyrics were written by Mary Kidder and the music by S. George Sibley. The full lyrics are below:
Cast on 21sts
These sweat shirts seem to be very "à la mode" right now in the middle school in my town. Have you seen them on teens in your corner of the world? I don't know if this is a brand that exists anywhere else but in French markets and stores. Maybe. It says US Marshall on them, which doesn't necessarily mean that they come from the USA. So far, none of these sweatshirts has made it into one of our girls' closets...
So, it is decided. I will begin my gymnastics training again here in just a couple of weeks. I’ve already mentioned that I want to start training at Woodward at Copper this summer, and I think getting back into a real gym with a real coach is a great way to start.
My baby couldn’t breathe. She had aspirated and was choking and couldn’t breathe enough air into her lungs to cough it out. Mama rescue overdrive kicked in and I picked her up, flipped her over and, holding her chin in my hand, I hit her back over and over to try to get it out. She wasn’t really doing anything and the drool was pouring out of her mouth and the tears out of her eyes and I wasn’t sure if I was clearing her airway at all – I know I wasn’t hitting it as hard as they taught in our CPR class but I was hitting, slapping. Scott kept asking if we should call 911 and at first I said yes! Then just like that, she seemed to be breathing again. So I told him to wait. And before I knew it, she coughed a tiny little cough, some of the vomit came out her nose, and she was gasping again. Until that moment I thought she was clear, and at that moment I realized she was not and I had no idea how much was left in there so I held her still face down with drool and spit up and tears landing on the blanket below us as I smacked her over and over. Then Scott grabbed her from me and took over with her chin in his hand, hitting her between the shoulder blades, trying to get her airway clear. And it was the same thing all over again. 911? She’s ok! Gasps, 911! No, wait, breathing! No, choking again! And finally I called the audible. I grabbed the baby and threw the phone to Scott and barked for him to call 911 because THIS WAS NOT NORMAL.
I rounded the bottom of the jacket and the bottom of the shirt by placing a bowl unside down on the paper and drawing a curved line. It worked really good. The tie was cut by hand..surprising it is so straight.
Happy Running.
I told T’s mom yesterday that this past year, this year, maybe the next or so will be the hardest. That it’s like when you’re at the beach and trying to get to the sandbar. You know it’s out there. But to get to it, you have to get through the crashing waves, through the deep water, and trust and have faith that the sandbar really is there and you will get to it and stand up, above the water and be able to look back and say, wow, this is pretty cool. Just hold tight until you reach the sandbar!
you move forward
Clap, flash, hot and bright I burn out
1/2 cup all purpose flour
The second device? Haneke turns the tables once more, denying us those same pleasures the villains are exacting from their victims. We don't see a thing below the neck when the mother is forced to undress. We don't see any gunshots save the one that is undone seconds later. Haneke is teasing us, calling us sick and then denying us our gratification. In doing so, he walks a fine line - is he crowing over how much smarter he is than his audience? (This is why I stopped watching Todd Solondz movies.) Or is he earnestly trying to break things up, to get us to acknowledge the way in which we receive media and are manipulated by it?
As the three Mod dogs laughed with each other, a rather regal looking Ziggy the greyhound appeared over the grassy ridge and joined them.
Fruit-juice in hand I wander along a darkened corridor destination the exhibit proper and slow-motion stumble over a trailing wire and straight into a slightly stooping grey-bearded figure who has a young lady in full-throttle Muslim attire on his arm.
At 17 my body completely rebelled. I couldn’t loose more weight and I realized I was going to die for a job. The next day I was completely chastised by my agency for my size and one agent pulled me aside and said, “There’s an option for you. You can either go plus-size or do commercial work.” And I asked, “What’s plus-size modeling? I’ve never heard of that.” And she said, “Well it means you can be whatever size you want and model.” But she said it was for old women! But for whatever reason, everything made sense and I knew this was the route I had to take. I went and had a salad with salmon and walnuts and olive oil. I gave into what my body needed. I could be healthy and happy and still model., says Crystal.
And now for this week’s haiku!
One of the best ways to watch a film is to know absolutely nothing about it. Whether it was the trailer or publicity tidbits, I avoided anything to do with Kahaani like the plague. Not because I dislike Vidya or have anything against the film itself – in fact, it was the opposite; I was so eager to see Kahaani and enjoy it without any unrealistic expectation, that I imposed a media blackout on the film. As well as being Vidya’s next offering after The Dirty Picture, it was also the next film I was seeing after Paan Singh Tomar (which is my favourite film of 2012 so far), therefore any unnecessary hype would certainly rain on my parade.
I spent Thursday morning as teacher's helper in Junior's nursery school. We helped 25 four year olds make Easter baskets from old milk containers. I was in charge of helping them glue on cotton tails, stick on whiskers, draw on faces, and affix ears. In case you've never been to hell it sounds like this:
"I'm now on welfare," said Tom dolefully.
Wheeew, thanks for bearing with me, I hope you've enjoyed my "a little different" project for today?!
? Getting Sick
INT: 2d6 (7)
This tour, as always, features me writing about what happens in the world and what happens to me. I’ve earned my living as a poet for 32 years, done more than 2,700 gigs in 24 countries and, even in the darkest days of Thatcherism, I didn’t have the kind of material I have now.
This will enlarge so that you can read it.
A short while ago 'SIBOL' was featured in 'Craftseller' and a Lady by the name of Maralyn contacted me by email to say that her Mother would be knitting some Squares for our Alzheimers fund raising. Well today in the post I received a beautiful Red, Blue and White blanket made by Sheila who will be 88 years of age this August.
...burrr.burrr.. i wore natural face, with no smile but yes with thumping heart climbing up the stairs...
For more advanced or adventurous cooks, try brining your pork chops for about 20 min. before rinsing and rubbing them, using a solution of 2C water, 2 Tb. kosher salt and 2 Tb. white sugar. You can pour the brining solution right into a ziploc bag and toss the pork chops in. Refrigerate, perhaps flipping the bag over after the first 10 min. This brining process will make them extra juicy! If you use the brining method, consider cutting back a little on the salt in the rub.
Following the momentous Goresbrook victory, I was the secretary and events organiser for the wining Goresbrook councillor and assisted him with his daily activities after he was elected.
The Card and Challenges are :
This is for either the scrapbook kit OR the card kit...here is the link for more information....
Spotted trout lily is one of the many spring wildflowers that grow in my backyard. As the name suggests, they reminded me of the rainbow trout that inhabit my creek. In years past, I had never seen the trout spawn before Ostara. And so, I took a walk into the woods, to the creek, and stood and listened.
So the medication reduction journey will be continued as of next Tuesday, and the plan is that I will, hopefully, be off all my neuropathic medication by the end of May. I can’t wait for that. My doctor has given me a sick note for work that will run out on the 23rd May. Hopefully that will be when I can restart work but that is not guaranteed, it’s all dependant on how I get on with the drug reduction process.
Both functions, however, can lead individuals to be quite supportive of their community. An Introverted Feeler in harmony with their community can experience their ideals deeply, with great emotion. Similarly, an Introverted Thinker in harmony with their community’s concepts can very naturally apply them in more sophisticated ways, extending their range.
Do I have experiences that will enhance these beliefs and do I have the ability to share these experiences?
So for me, to hear Jose so happy, to hear her laugh so much, to know that she is entering the world of relation-ships with this young man who treats her well, respects her, makes me really happy.
As much as I detest her wild behavior!
In other news I went to a baby shower the end of February. I was actually really proud of myself for going. It was for a friend of mine who is having a girl due 3/29. If it was for a boy I might not have gone in all honesty. For some reason I can handle baby girl stuff better than boy stuff. The shower was very cute and the gals who threw it really put a lot of planning into it because it was beautiful. She got a bunch of cute stuff and it was generally enjoyable, but it put me in an awkward place....When you go to a baby shower there are women who have children and women who don't....I didn't really fit in to either of these groups. The non-mothers would talk about where they went out drinking the night before or dinner or the new bag they bought....I live in the burbs instead of the heart of Dallas like I did pre-pregnancy and we don't go out anymore so I didn't have much to say to them. The mothers would talk about their kiddos, how old they are, funny things they did about their birth etc.......my baby is gone, I don't have any cute stories to tell about Aidan, about what he did or said and if I started to talk about the birth I would have to go into the details of his death and since most of the women there were complete strangers I wasn't going to make them feel uncomfortable.
Right now, B is in his room and is detoxing.
Yield: 10 (1 cup) servings
It was a nice day yesterday so we couldn't resist going out. Yuppi and I had a trip to my hometown taking homemade takeout bentos with us. Since I got some photos there I'm going to share them sometime.
Me: Hi! My husband and I just bought a home in your town and we were wondering if you have any ordinances about chickens or rabbits.
ASSEMBLY Speaker Sheldon Silver is refusing to release the Ethics Committee report on disgraced former Assemblyman Roger Green, despite hopes by committee members he would do so.
Nikki entered the Licorice International Facebook contest and won a $15.00 gift certificate to be used at Licorice International online or at Licorice International, 803 Q Street, Lincoln, Nebraska.
On our way out, Begga wrapped us all up in enormous hugs, and I bought a used horseshoe. Good times.
Increasingly this time is being branded 'young adult' when in fact it is 'pre-adult'. Children of this age are still children, regardless of whether they engage in activities that are considered adults. These not-quite-adults are starting to get a sense of what the world is really like. They do not fully understand that they will never fully understand it.
It was fun interacting with other authors, too, and just being in a bookstore is always a good thing.
Daughter asked to learn about China today. We got out a book about China and started reading. It is one of those that goes through the alphabet and talks about something related to China for every letter. Page one of the book took us to the globe to see China's location. Talk changed to Daughter saying " It must be summer in China because it is winter here". To the globe we go with a laser pointer. She sees the different spot sizes depending on where the laser pointer shines - northern hemisphere, equatorial region, or southern hemisphere. She decides that winter in Maryland happens at the same time as summer in Chile, but China has the same season as we do.
Yesterday I was running Java over the contact board. We are suppose to slowly raise the board. This was going to be the last time I ran it like this before I had an up ramp. I had practiced with her before running it, to let her know the board was a little higher. She was doing fine. She had already run the board about 12 times with no problems. I was just going to do a couple of more runs and then all of a sudden she wouldnt run the board. I had not given her a direct shot to the board but she got it the first time. So then I went back to straight shot to the board. She still wouldnt get on. So after three times of not getting on the board we stopped. I went inside and looked at the video. I slowed down the time before she stopped getting on the board.
I enjoyed a steak dinner – something I normally never order out. But our server informed us that they sell more steaks than anything else so I couldn’t resist to see why. I ordered the ribeye (once again, completely out of character for me) to see how their infra-red broiler would work with the marble of fat and meat. I ordered it medium rare and what I got was spot on. One of the best cooked steaks I have ever ordered out, it had a beautiful sear locking in all the juices and resting to the perfect temperature that I had ordered. The crust was created through high heat and a house bast wad used to create a great flavor component. Olive oil, soy sauce, garlic, and black olives created a tapenade type of topping for the steak. A steak purist might baulk at this, but I thought it added such a great and unique flavor to every bite. Like the fish, the steak also came with a sauce on the side. I ordered the bernaise, a classic egg and butter sauce, but didn’t really eat it as the steak was so flavorful on it’s own. But I do have to mention the bearnaise was made very well. My sides were grilled asparagus, delightfully crisp and tender at the same time, and the potato au gratin. The au gratin looked great, loaded with four different types of cheese, but when eating it I was left wanting something else. I couldn’t help but see it prepared in a large pan and refrigerated, cooked and then cut into portions before being reheated. I’m sure that wasn’t the case (though I didn’t ask how it was prepared) but there was nothing to rave about. The flavors of four cheeses was underwhelming as cheddar was the main taste. It didn’t seem like it was cooked all the way through either, too dense in texture. The steak was clearly the winner of my meal as it was absolutely delicious.
ADL gave its spy data to Israel. Surprise!
Wisdom in Hibernation
12. The Slits - Number One Enemy
Rode the six hundred:
Cuisine: eggs benedict & steamed asparagus with hollandaise / fresh mixed fruit
I looked back… and saw the sun sneaking behind the clouds as the day drew to a close.
Support Feed Foundation’s “Hungry in America” Sunday night with delicious food and drinks at Tom Colicchio’s Colicchio + Sons hosted by Tom himself and Natalie Portman. General admission is $250, but if you spring for $750 more you can show up an hour before other guests (6pm) where Tom will be cooking front and center. 85 10th Avenue. Check it out at the feed foundation’s site.
Interestingly enough, men don’t cry, but they can get loud, or bang on something when they are frustrated out in the open. The men in our IT department can get crunk with one another real quick. But people write that off as men being men.
Option 1: I move to Kentucky and work at a bourbon distillery. This strikes me as very dramatic. For starters it would include drinking alcohol again and there’s nothing more dramatic than that. It would also have me living in some rural country town which would be shocking in itself as I’ve never lived farther than 30 miles away from a metropolitan area. The downside is I would probably get pregnant cause last I checked, all anyone in the bible belt does is drink whiskey and get knocked up. Oh and they go to church and judge gays…and single white women trying to make it big in Los Angeles…which I guess would make me a hypocrite…although technically I would have left that life for beautiful Paducah, KY. Ugh…fuck it. I hate Kentucky. Get me outta here.
Wheelchair with emergency supply backpack: 30 lbs
Nothing else about the bar appears to have changed.
So we’ve got everything stuffed in the Audi. Miraculously we’ve managed to fit enough luggage to serve four adults and three kids for two weeks into the car. There was probably a roof rack, there might have even been one us kids strapped to it at one point. So have we got everything, then?
droplets bead upon the sill
9. Air Attack
My children wouldn’t let me make a top 10 list of alphabet books without including this classic. Chicka Chicka Boom Boom is their favorite! When they were young they loved listening to the rhythmic verse. Now they enjoy reading it themselves, again and again. In this highly imaginative tale, the letters in the alphabet partake in a race to the top of the coconut tree until all of them fall down into one large jumbled heap! What happens then? Well, the letters are injured in one way or another. They come out of the pile up, bruised, twisted and missing teeth! “H is tangled up with I/J and K are about to cry!” Bill Martin Jr. and John Archambault gave us a gift with this book and it is sure to please every parent and child!
Poorly bear
Dunlop produces one of the most extensive ranges of tyres, and since its highly innovative beginnings, has grown to be one the world’s best known tyre brands. The brand is once again at the cutting edge of tyre technology and as a result Dunlop tyres are fitted as standard by many of the world’s leading car manufacturers such as Audi, BMW, Lexus and Honda.
A button cover kit, decorators needle and upholstery thread. It was around $13 (after a coupon) for these.
I don't know who wrote this letter - though it was clearly sanctioned by the government. What I can tell you is that even if the flytilla idiots don't read it - Israelis are reading it and walking around the country smiling today. Oh, this letter is from each one of us - to each one of you idiots who think to take advantage of our democracy. You probably won't get very far today - most have already been turned down before they get on any planes - in Switzerland, Rome, Paris and elsewhere. Others have landed and been turned around. To each, these words come from our hearts!
How she does it
There’s nothing humorous about In The Maybe World. This album ranks right up there with Berlin, The Painted Word, and Germano’s own Geek The Girl as one of Rock’s classic works of introspective sadness. The theme is loss. These are the lyrics to Too Much Space:
Last week, Shabby Apple contacted me and asked if I would be interested in giving away a piece of jewelry to my readers... I was shocked! I have watched (and entered) giveaways at other blogs, but they were HUGE blogs...with tons of readers...Me? not a big blog...although I love my faithful readers...
* Baby Don't You Know (1977; peaked at #43)
Round at Sean’s house, the drifts are so deep that he wants to jump out of his bedroom window into the snow, just a few feet below. His dad shouts for him not to, “the car’s under there!” he yells. It was true, although there was no sign of their burgundy Vauxhall Cavalier mk1 now. Just the white. For the rest of the day, and the next few weeks, Sean and I explore a new arctic wilderness. Everything has changed. There is no boundary between path and road, field and street. Just pure, untouched white. We build caves and igloos and navigate new uncharted territory until new snowfall and blizzards drive us back.
The stonewalling has to stop — but it appears the Department of Justice would rather abolish the ATF than answer questions. Not that the evaporation of a government agency in general seems all that problematic to me — but it’s imperative that Issa and Grassley arrive at answers before everyone who knew anything — and who can confirm Eric Holder knew about the program, too — is out of office.
I almost didn't think I would make it.
If I lift up my buttocks (stop retching you lot in your 20’s, it’ll happen to you too!) there are white lines cupping them from underneath like hammocks where the tan didn’t reach, and a little 6 inch line round my waist where I presume the spare tyre folds over. Just on one side! I wonder if I’ve had a stroke and not noticed.
This brings up the question of whether God created good (and evil) or whether these are concepts that exist independent of the existence of a deity. As a child I recited during my prayers, “God is good, God is great.” Does goodness exist because God SAYS it is good? If God IS Good, he does not define Good. An eternal Being who IS Goodness cannot have created Goodness. It must be, theologically speaking, a metaphysical Truth beyond definition or creation. Taking the anthropological view of the subject, I believe goodness exists because it benefits nature as a whole, specifically in the interest of man. The basis of what is good is derived from its inherent benefit to our survival as a race.
I'm so proud of this little baby...it keeps growing each week
the Spinning Wheel.
Happy Earth Day. We celebrated yesterday and today by helping to release squirrels into the wild.
3. I now have 18 dolls. This time last year I had zero!
This group came from Houston, but
7) Obama Promised Paygo and Then Offered to Extend the Bush Tax Cuts without paying for them. First of all Obama NEVER promised Paygo it was a demand that Racists made of him that he was willing to adhere to to please them. The fact that Racists never demanded the Bush Tax Cuts be payed for proves they’re full of crap.
Dear Senator Miriam,
Spinach gnocchi with brown butter
We managed to find both boxes within half an hour; the other half hour was spent walking from home to the first cache and back from the second cache, both hidden where they were described to be. Good luck fellow geocachers and let us hope the owner of these two caches comes and replaces them with less than sodden boxes logs and pens.
Lux—This is usually a way of measuring gentle depth. In dslr camera talk, lux means the lowest level of gentle required for your camera to look at pics. the low the lux, the greater susceptible your camera.
I did some translations from Paul Celan, from his posthumously-published book Schneepart (1971), in about 2001 (You can find them online here).
The Latest Nutrition Profile
Ashley is the outsider that wants to become an East Hamptons socialite, organizes parties and acts as the assistant and spokeswoman of the Graysons. She wears minidresses most of the time, in bright colours, from Topshop to Donna Karan. Looks like she escaped from Gossip Girl. She adds a very stylish touch to the series, hope they give her more screen time in the next episodes.
Many of these southern Bassin d'Arcachon constructions were positioned to enjoy strategic vantage points positioned high up on the dunes. Some are still there, in amongst the sand and sparse vegetation, while some have succombed to the constant movement of the landscape and tumbled 60 to 100 metres down to the beach. Others may have started out on the beach but, with the ocean gaining ground on the land, now lie out at sea at depths that can reach 25 metres.
I thought now this is great! I think I might have a keeper here.
This sex themed conversation continues as Martine, Glenda, Gilda, the reporter, and the Baron sit down to eat pastries in an erotic manner. Now sporting pigtails, Catherine Ringer's raw talent still manages to shine through despite being saddled with hokey dialogue. Taking the reporter out to her dingy-looking trailer, Martine decides to share her Uruguayan sex slave Nana (Gemma Giménez) with the inquisitive reporter. And by "share," I mean allow him to have sexual intercourse with her on a stained mattress. Instructing her to disrobe, Martine then tells Nana to play with herself. After she's finished, Martine asks the reporter, "Would you like it if she pleased you with her mouth?" Do I have to tell you what his answer was? Besides, we all know what this leading to. Nonetheless, it's the occasional shot of Catherine Ringer's pigtail framed face, and, not to mention, the sound of Klaus Schulz's swooshing synths, that make this scene interesting.
Okay. I've had a quick rant, I feel better now.
This has been compounded by the refusal of ordinary people to realize, know and understand that it is the duplicity of Governments and the deceit and endless greed of bankers that combined to simply fleece them like the apathetic sheep they are. Apathy and ignorance of the truth, creates belief in the lie. The truth is self-evident, but most people choose to neither hear it nor understand it. The debts of the Federal Reserve are the debts of a private corporation that is robbing the people of the United States.
Soak the liver in the milk, at 30°C, for a couple of hours. Remove and dry.
01 The Disciples - The Struggle Of Life (7:10)
3 credit course, register for this J460 topic only!
How do I know? And how do I stay strong against the affection that I wanted all these years? Can I keep pushing him away when I desire it so badly? Why did it have to get this bad for him to express his love? I do believe he loves me. But I don’t believe he can change enough for me to love him. But do I try anyway? For the sake of marriage and kids?
End of Act One
I put this to use quite often for all types of batter grinding and on one such day, I took some pictures of the process.....and sharing them through this post.
Grizzly Bearhug - Giant art Andrew Christine
Well, it was a natural progression for a Dr Who fan, such as myself, to move to the next best thing from the program I loved - the book.
So every every disadvantage has an advantage
It's me Linda and I am hosting this week....
Aren't they gorgeous?
Wonderful Serimuka or we Kedahan call it pulut sekaya :)
They looked almost artistic by nature. As she approached the door she felt compelled to continue. There was no sense of foreboding or as we would call it a fight or flight feeling. She felt at peace. The door opened almost instantly when she had reached for the knocker. There in front of her stood a simple old woman. She could have been anyone’s grandmother as she stood there holding a tray of lemon bars. Masumi stepped into the home which looked more spacious in the inside than it had from the outside.
With that, many of my former Adweek, Brandweek and Mediaweek colleagues, will watch, and wait, for Monday morning.
“Hey Kenneth, this is your cousin. I was wondering if you would come and help me clean our apartment?”, my cousin Brandon says.
Read the account for yourself. Have you ever thought of what it must have been like?
Loud noise and yelling from top balcony upon arrival. Made contact with three residents including the chapter president. Multiple responses over the last two weeks all with verbal warnings. Three Town Bylaw noise tickets issued.
I watched with absolute pleasure. It brings me such happiness to create bonds with people, to teach and learn, to share joys and break down barriers and this was a very special one. The language challenge was gone. The opportunity to share with each other created a memorable experience for all, and it was serenely sweet to watch them all partake in this simple, heartfelt custom that they knew in a different way.
Its been a toughy! But I’m getting there and pleased to say, with the help of the challenge I now have had over 2000 views and almost 70 followers! So I thank you all right from the little bug that lives in my heart!
The Chamber of Patent Disputes upheld the decision of the Patent Office. It pointed out that the mark applied for included a figurative and a word element, but that the dominant element was the word 'Lenin' because it would be memorised more easily than the figurative element. The attention of the consumer would thus be focused specifically on that word element. Given that Lenin is the name of a political personality who is well known worldwide, the mark applied for would create an association with Lenin himself, rather than with any trade marked goods...."Meanwhile, in a newsletter feature, "Rospatent Appeals Moscow Court Decision In 'Putin-Medvedev' Vodka Trademark Case", the IPKat's friends at Petosevic report as follows:
We’re not going to raise neurons from the dead. New neurons form in the human brain quite rarely (despite claims to the contrary – I frankly don’t believe Gage’s work), but hopefully we might be able to make those left function better. The preparation is from Ayurvedic medicine, and people have been taking the stuff for millenia without dying on the spot. It’s time to find out what the active principle actually is in the preparation, and get to work.
I must say that the book was a fascinating read. I was kept engaged in the book as I was hoping for a good outcome in the surgery, even though I knew the outcome. As a parent myself and someone who has had to have one of their children in the hospital overnight, I felt for the parents. I could empathize with them even though my children have not had to go through anything so extreme. It wasn’t until a couple of months after the surgery that young Colton Burpo started telling of his visit to Heaven and the father, Todd Burpo, started trying to line up scripture with what Colton was saying.
ABV 5.6% AA 74.5%
Take Microsoft Word 2007… I was almost there… I was just starting to get comfortable knowing how to use the software… knowing every single way of doing things… then someone decided to come out with Word 2010. The same thing…copy and paste, highlighting, incorporating actions to make it user friendly… except you have to learn how to use it all over again. Find out how to do the same thing in a different way.
I'm not ashamed to say that one of the watchwords for the wedding was decadence. (Not sure it quite happened but it is still part of the dream.)
1. Combine the two rices in a large bowl. Wash and drain three times under water, each time swishing the rice around whilst rubbing the grains between your fingers.
Bill: "My great aunt Sofia? But I heard that her money went to family. Wait a minute. How old are you?"
08. GAME of LIFE
To begin, I found a card of Patina, which is similar to Panache, the first thread used. Then I searched through my stash to find a variety of threads that fit the description, e.g., a round thread equivalent to a #5 pearl in thickness, shiny if possible. What I came up with were a Thread Gatherer Silken Pearl, DMC #5 Perle Coton, Rainbow Gallery Fiesta and Grandeur, and DMC #8 Perle Coton. I went a little thinner on a couple of the threads to see what the effect would be, and added in the stranded rayon for another bit of flexibility. Then I set to stitching, and this is what I got.
Overnight the Asian markets were mostly lower losing 0.1%. Europe opened lower but gained 0.7%. US index futures were higher overnight and gapped up at the opening to SPX 1382. The SPX had closed at 1377 yesterday. Within the opening minutes the SPX rose to 1384, dipped to 1381, and then resumed its rally. Around noon the FED released: http://www.federalreserve.gov/newsevents/press/bcreg/20120420a.htm, the SPX hit 1387 and then started to pullback. Heading into the close the SPX hit 1378, and then closed at 1379.
2. When cool, remove the peppers from the bag, peel the skin and remove the seeds and stem. Place in a blender with the fresh thyme and puree. Add the olive oil and balsamic vinegar and combine. Add salt and pepper to taste. Refrigerate until use.
As down she knelt for heaven's grace and boon;
Given the severe penalties for insulting the monarchy in Thailand, no-one was surprised when Ms Daranee was arrested shortly afterwards.
A couple of years ago I helped facilitate an NERC sandpit which I thought was a brilliant approach to solving intractible problems, and so was intrigued by this story last week about a similar approach on the Times Higher Education website.
These are not the actual lyrics. They are better.
This card is in the challenge of a new challenge blog:
We now have the Internet, Facebook, Linked-in and other social networking tools. They weren’t of any help in finding Irshad. Wikipedia entry on him is in German. I blogged about him – Irshad Mia, where are you ? – in the hope that if Irshad or someone who knew of his current whereabouts were to read my piece in DadiNani , he or she would know where to find me. This was my way of sending a message-in-the-bottle, tossed out into cyberspace.
Several years ago, the brewers began working with a unique Bavarian hefeweizen yeast strain unknown in this country. This amazingly flavorful yeast was so exciting that they began working on a recipe for a traditional German hefeweizen with the Sierra Nevada twist. Traditional hefeweizen is a style that seems deceptively simple, but in reality is devilishly complex. For years the brewers weren't satisfied with the beer; something was missing. In a flash of inspiration, an epic trip was arranged. The brewers took a whirlwind tour through the legendary Bavarian wheat breweries to see what they were doing. It was there they realized the advantages of making wheat beer using the traditional system of open fermentation.
rocks me all night long
The conditions for conformity:
How did they do that? What was I doing wrong? Okay, I told myself, today you will not stop until you've finished a thousand new words. But the thousand new words were such crap that I found myself paralyzed. What was wrong with me? Why couldn't I just can't churn like everyone else seemed to be doing?
What’s the most basic underlying cause of avalanches?
Heat 1 tbsp oil in a saucepan. make the tadka with mustard and cumin seeds add the asafoetida and curry leaves to it.Add the raw mango seed and then add the cooked dal to it. Now add the masala,chilli pwd ,jaggery and salt to it. Add some water to make it desired consistency. Bring it to boil.
Postcard by W. H. Applebee of Ashford. Click the postcard to enlarge.
One of the nifty things I picked up this weekend at the NRA Annual Meetings & Convention was CRKT's Eat'N Tool. It is a fork and spoon, or spork, as well as a bottle opener, screw driver. It also has three metric wrench sizes for emergency repairs.
The wicked people who did not like Jesus Christ had finally obtained permission from their leaders to put him to death. These people beat Jesus and made fun of him. They took him to a hill outside the city and nailed him to a cross.
D.H: Giants can't convert, have to punt, 9:30 to go.
Places: In what Parisian hood would you love to live in? We all have our favorites! Why is it yours, what makes it all that?
for our welfare and stability,
And so the day ended. Blood, bleeding, babies crying. Wait. How am I alive again?
Commenter Judmiller:
In expectation of the upcoming escape, I've created a little list of crafty to-dos. We'll be enjoying the sun in Cabo San Lucas, so these items are all beach and flower-in-your-hair appropriate.
Cinematography: Hugo
So The twins are struggling with feeding time. They are hungry so they cry, but when you feed them and they start to suck I think they are crying because it burns? I'm just assuming because I don't know what thrush feels like, but I do know what a yeast infection feels like and that's pretty uncomfortable. On top of that they are congested from the cold, sneezing like crazy and just plain Not happy babies.
It’s also the point not where the movie lost me, but kind of overwhelmed me. It kind of turned from watching a super hero movie into watching something more akin to Full Metal Jacket. Everyone kind of starts to lose it and by the end I felt a little…. violated. Not in a good way, but not necessarily in a bad way. Most superhero movies leave you wanting to be like the hero, saving the day and doing some good. But this ending leaves me feeling like even attempting to be a superhero would be a bad idea.
But...
Thought on this teapot were that I would prefer to get more definition with a dark outer round.
My well-educated and urbane demeanour might not give it away, but I come from a relatively poor background. (Although, to be sure, I had classmates at school whose home situation was much worse than mine.)
The Irish Independent reports on the sale today and says that it was worth €12m at the height of the boom, and today’s asking price represents a 76% discount.
Mitt Romney has many considerable advantages which should not be discounted in this electoral season--electability, however, isn't one of them. It is largely a myth that Romney is more electable than Rick Santorum. Romney may have the ability to garner more votes than Santorum. Romney may be less polarizing than Santorum. And with Santorum there is a greater risk that could lose by a far greater margin than Romney. But there is a clearer path to victory in the general election for Santorum, for one reason--Pennsylvania.
A. Propane, large full sized Propane Fridge, yes about 1000 but so much more eco friendly and power friendly. They have a 110 volt back up and can be run on one 1 pound bottle for about a month, wow energy miser. That is from literature. Propane appliances have grown up.
They started with a loose conceit in Southernplayalisticadillacmuzik, but then raised the bar with every album after that, eventually ending up with the film musical Idlewild, which was lackluster on the screen, but had a solid soundtrack (there are maybe five artists who wouldn't take "Mighty O" and "Morris Brown" and whatever else and not be better off for it). Unfortunately, the goddamned concept albums tore them apart. Hopefully the Roots' yin and yang, Black Thought and Questlove, won’t let undun be their undoing.
"A majority of U.S. women use social networking sites, and half of them say social networking sites influence their shopping habits. These are some of the key findings from a new study on online socials networking among women performed by social media platform SheSpeaks," says the website Marketing Vox.
Some of these unwanted catches are used as bait, other, healthy specimens are returned to the loch, although there are plenty of anxious diners ready to feast before they get to the loch bed.
We have neighbors here in NY that several years ago began building a wall in our lower driveway. They thought they'd erect a gate and felt that the right hand column (we do share a driveway) would be best fitted right smack dab in the middle of our lower driveway preventing us from parking near our house or even entering this drive. Luckily friends alerted us, we called a lawyer and he sent the standard US threat letter - F-U strong letter to follow. My hubby, who needless to say does not like this neighbor due to this and many incidents, enjoyed his coffee each morning on our deck as he watched the poor workers who had erected the column now take it down stone by stone.
Probably my mom.
Far better to concentrate on the victims for now, as nefarious and murky dealings in Ukraine have a habit of coming out for a public airing eventually, as Ex-President Kuchma, ex-Prime Minister Tymoshenko and no doubt when the current authorities become “ex”, they too will discover. That is if there is any political involvement in this case.
High Priest: Where elders go to die.
When they arrived Madziwanyika, Charumbira, Chingoma told their people to come to a meeting. Madzivanyika asked Wandimirwa saying, Why did you run away from the husbands which we gave you?” They answered that they wanted to live where Gutu and Mashonganyika Iived because at that place there were some rocks where they dried their mealie meal. This place there were no rocks. Then Madzivanyika became angry after hearing it, he took a spear and killed Wandimirwa and Recha. Guhwa and Mashonganyika saw this, they also were very angry. They took spears and fought against Madzivanyika and his relatives.
Look, I know. If you're reading this blog, chances are you're a craft beer enthusiast (or a whiskey drinker, and I promise: more of that this year, too!). But ain't it great that people are ready to shrug off mass-media domination and buy regional? Buy something different? I think it is. Yuengling, like Sam Adams, is often the first step for someone to try something other than the usual. This is why "the usual" is sliding hard, and why the big guys are trying to find out how to make something other than the usual (Blue Moon and Shock Top are just the beginning, believe me).
"We found that highly extroverted people are happier with their lives because they tend to hold a positive, nostalgic view of the past and are less likely to have negative thoughts and regrets, said the study author Professor Ryan Howell, a psychologist at San Francisco State University.
“Did you have to go to karate when you were a kid?” he asked.
I may be a hit and miss blogger.
54Warm from the soul, and faithful to its fires,
And those pieces are out there, inside the colours and outside my mind.
Barney Bentall
There’s nothing we can do about this, except perhaps ask for a humiliating full-body pat down in lieu of the Naked Body Scan. We are powerless before the impresarios of the Security Theater.
We are the next generation. It’s time to spread some grace.
And now today, he isn't home and I'm wanting him. I feel good, really good and I'm craving my Dom. This is how I know that I truly am a submissive and that those other thoughts I was having come from a different place....they aren't a true reflection of my real heart desire.
Tony Bourdain is the cool badass dude who wants to show the world that he is willing to eat anything and everything and has extraordinary contempt for the conventional and commonplace. He is somewhat like Guy Fieri in some ways. Fieri doesn't want to leave the frat house. Bourdain still wants to be one of the cool kids who hangs in smoky bars, flirts with danger, and tries to prove how cool he is by showing you how much he doesn't care. He never quite grew up either.
What a couple, Kim Kardashian and new boyfriend Kanye West are. Two of the biggest egos in the celebrity world . Yes Old Knudsen knows that this relationship is mostly for publicity oh look they just happen to be walking about the street.
I won this from Diane also know as DissyB.
So, there are MANY people who have moved heaven and earth to get the celestial bodies in the right place to make this happen. I mean Sarah Davies (of course), Jerry Kalajian, Gale Anne Hurd (big fan-boy moment when I met her!), Beatrice Springborn and the GIT crew. You're all invited around mine for Christmas lunch. We're having the traditional Murgh Mussallam.
Holder’s remarks in the Palmetto State come just weeks after the Justice Department blocked the state’s new voter ID law from taking effect, citing an unfair burden on minority voters.
Obama gets better marks on Afghanistan with 47% of voters saying they support his approach there to 37% who are opposed. Not surprisingly he gets more support from Republicans on this issue than health care (30% compared to 5%) and less from Democrats (63% compared to 69%). His Afghanistan stance isn't doing anything to help his overall standing with GOP voters though- even among those who say they agree with him on this issue his approval rating is only 13%.
1372 **D-II/23/2001. “On the Use and Abuse of the Federalist.” Professor Thomas Engeman’s Class, Political Science Department, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2003(2), above, pp. 839-42.)
But there was no romance for Rachel Martin at the moment. Or any moment actually. She sat at her desk and stared at the computer screen. Her so-called best friend Jessica sat on the bed twirling an unwoven string from Rachel’s pink animal print bedspread. Rachel’s mother had picked out that bedspread when Rachel was seven-years-old. Rachel still slept in a room decorated for a first-grader.
575 D-V/31/1968. “A Guide to Contemporary Greece, Especially for Greek-Americans,” Interview by John Anastaplo, WJOB-Radio, Hammond, Indiana.
Buying an Automatic Men’s Watch – Useful Information and Tips
The postcard is an ad card from a shop in New Orleans that carries charms and other magical items Marie Laveau might have used, however, Anna writes that "they got nothing in this store that compares to the old library voodoo books."
Package 6 Days 7 Pax 5200 Euros
It is my opinion (agreeing with Tabletalk writers) that “Jesus’ spirit never went to hell, but on the cross He suffered the full wrath of God that is poured out in hell.” And even with all of that physical pain, the most intense suffering he endured came when he lost the gaze of his Father in heaven, causing him to cry out, “My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?” I shudder even as I type this.
read May 15, 2012
Looking at this book of Acts, as a whole, we find it incorporates a transition, beginning with the offer of the kingdom toIsraeland ending with the ministry of God’s grace to all the world. Without an understanding of this important book, we would fail to see God’s method of dealing with mankind today. You are going to learn many new and unusual things from this book of Acts.
My sense is that there’s this new age warrior movement afoot (probably started by Castenada) where people are equating being enlightened or awake or mature with never having to say they’re sorry. And that’s cow poop. My thought is not feeling guilty, not saying you’re sorry when you eff up doesn’t make you enlightened or a warrior poet, it makes you a sociopath.
Vanilla extract- 1 tsp
1/4 tsp. Sea salt
Verify that Time Warner Cable can service the address, If not, go to Step 3. If so, ensure the plan you are on is offered and check the price for the plan at the new location.
Jackie is full of stories on how to make your dreams a reality and how to get motivated to accomplish it all. Listening to her is truly inspiring, she makes you believe that "hey, if I can do it all, so can you." Well, that's not exactly true. Jackie is one-of-a-kind special, her humbleness keeps her from seeing how accomplished she truly is. Her lust for life is infectious and we all felt so motivated after listening to her life story. I hope you will too!
But then part of receiving this honor is to choose five other blogs that you feel the same way about. That's when I got stuck. I really was quite torn and then it became a much bigger issue in my mind (I think it was bringing back some residual memories from elementary school). I couldn't pick just five. I had a really hard time narrowing it down to the ones I did pick.
"Due to lack of proper communications, parents have been ill-informed about what's happening when. Students have lost most of their playground, the school has become dusty on the inside, and of course -- danger at the school has increased. Only this past Friday (two days ago) did we parents learn that asbestos removal work is planned for this coming Monday night.
He prayed that God not take them out of the world, but that He keeps them from the evil (John 17:5). In other words, Jesus prayed for God to be their SHADE (John 17:15).
A light to medium coverage, silicone-based oil-free liquid foundation, containing a weightless formula that creates a naked feel to the skin, good coverage and a natural flawless finish.
But what is flawed in today’s media is the need to make a story out of nothing. With social-networking there comes a whole realm of opinion and expression (something that celebrities used to only see in fan mail and shout-outs on the red carpet). Now, regarding any topic, any trend, any type of situation, someone somewhere in the social-networking sphere has something to say about it. Especially because in the online world, there are no immediate, physical consequences for these actions.
A pleasant day to all of you, my friends, and welcome to Sisters Craft Cafe. It's me Venus, once again, posting my latest creation. I call this Marie Antoinette's Purse because this is how I envision her sending an invite to all her lady friends to a soiree, perhaps.
So, I guess what I really want to say in this post is thank you - to everyone who's supported me, encouraged me, and- most importantly of all - put up with me this year. It really means a lot.
“Teri, you’ve been wanting to try out for another musical for FOREVER. You will regret it if you skip this chance because you freaked out and chickened out. It will be like high school softball all over again. (You would have made it!) You love to perform; you love to sing for people. The timing is right with all of your activities. So, just go in and do it. If nothing else, for FUN. It will be FUN. Block out all of the young strangers. Block out your awkwardness at sticking out like a big turquoise and black thumb. And then you can say you did it. You WENT for it.”
At this point, I don’t know what to do. I know I have a minimum of six months of healing ahead of me. I am doing it. I want my hand to work as well as it will so I will do what it takes in terms of therapy. The problem I run in to is that I feel worthless and that I have no purpose. I look in my wife’s eyes and I can tell that she’s upset with me, deep down. There’s disappointment. She doesn’t want there to be but there is.
punched chipboard, which I could, perhaps afford!!!!!!
Mango cheesecake, pavlova cheesecake, tiramisu, raspberry cheesecake, pavlova with mango and cherries and plum pudding…
Jack and Teal’c sneak onboard using one of the Death Gliders swiped from Anubis before the Prometheus engages its hyper drive. With sam’s help, they overpower the skeleton crew which has already been softened up by Adrian conrad/Goa’uld’s desire to get ri of them and take the ship for himself. In a move that should not surprise anyone, Simmons is blendeed with the Goa’uld after he kills Adrian conrad. From the briefest of moments, it looks like Teal’c has run into an opponent he can defeat, but he gets his rear end handed to him. Jack success spaces Simmons/Goa’uld. It is a much more fitting end than his simply being arrested like last time.
The studio dancers could never stop
I think children and teens today are more sophisticated about the world than I was and they have to deal with a world that’s more fast-paced and complex and in some ways more ambiguous and nuanced than I did. Nevertheless, I think teens today want to read for the same underlying reasons I did—to find books with heart and soul, to identify with characters who overcome challenges and who persevere and transport us beyond ourselves. I still prefer books that end on a hopeful—though not necessarily happy—note, and I believe most of us crave that same thing, an aspect of hope for the future.
“But you were right.” Naida held back a chuckle.
We are pleased to introduce another new sponsor for this challenge and one of our regular sponsors.
The War of the Ring is over. The West — men, elves, hobbits, all of the noble races — has won. Sauron is gone, and the might of Mordor has been destroyed. The good and rightful king has been enthroned, and Middle Earth will have peace and joy forever.
重点：Airasia's on sale again~ but I have classes from 8am to 6pm! Wish me luck~
How many of us have been waiting for the new liquid natal casing for the 5th generation apple iPhone. How many of us have spent too many nights and countless hours going from blog to blog reading about it. The casing was supposed to make the upcoming Idevice a lot more thinner than the previous phones released by apple since 2007. It was also supposed to give the 5th generation device a tear-drop design. Making it very different from the last 2 iPhones released by apple. However a SIM card tray that is believed to be for the 5th generation device shows signs that the device will be boxes shaped just like the iPhone 4 and iPhone 4S.
However, it's not showing and I have no idea why. Almost no idea (blog...er. Cough. Sucks. Cough).
I did the cupboards above my washer and dryer for this. I wish I could say my laundry soap and stuff go here, but they just don't fit. My shelves don't move, and so most of my laundry stuff doesn't fit. I keep them on the side of the washer and on the dryer until I can figure something else out, or we move.
Erasmus Exchange Students 2008
By crash I mean we kissed the back of the car in front of us, and by kissed I mean pashed. Or maybe borderline assaulted. So there we were parked on the side of the road with R's parent's new car minorly dented in the front and the back of the other car majorly munted. Definitely missed dinner now.
Saturday's play was Blake Morrison's " We Are Three Sisters" . It weaves the story of Charlotte, Emily and Anne Bronte, echoing Chekov's " Three Sisters" with its essentially moving themes: women's work, their education, attitudes to marriage, and so much more....
The painful past is being discussed more openly. That’s good. Unfortunately the outdated, sickly suspicion of ‘strangers’ is still being kept alive. How else can a young man with his life ahead of him, feel so much hatred that in 2007 he could shoot the most prominent Armenian, newspaper editor Hrant Dink (born in Malatya), in the heart of Istanbul. What else to think of the fact that this hitman was slapped on the back in front of a camera by the policemen who had to arrest him? That they all posed together with the Turkish flag? And that the trial against Dinks assassins has got nowhere in four years? Or, that the trial against the slaughterers of three Christians in Malatya, that same year, is riddled with insinuations of state involvement, and that also there, justice has not moved an inch?
Anyway, have a look for yourself.
I invite you to visit their stunning body of work in their website and interesting articles in their blog:
That does not include the armed attacks targetting them in public: on the streets, in the shops, on the farms and inside businesses. And the vast majority of these victims were 'whites'.
Dad: "You can still go. We're just going to go to Oktoberfest."
I definitely don't have an answer for this one. I find it curious that only 13 percent of women keep their names after marriage. Do women change their names out of habit or tradition? For the sake of their children so that they'll have a "family" name? Answers, please!Though I don't begrudge anyone the opportunity to change her name, I am surprised that more women don't keep their given names after marriage. I have no desire to change my name if I get married. I grew up Danielle Brown and I intend to stay Danielle Brown. It's the name on my birth certificate, my report cards, my diploma, and my driver's license. My parents gave me a name that fits me. Why would I want to change it?
stay connected
Women are like sunglasses.....
I think that cake clubs are a great idea and I'd love to go along to one again, but I was a little surprised that Cakes 4 Fun charged £10 per person - I know they have overheads as they run a shop and classes, but we didn't actually learn or gain anything from the class other than talking to the other participants about their cakes. As far as I know, other cake clubs are more informal meet-ups that don't charge a fee. Unfortunately the other reason I'm banning myself from joining the Clandestine Cake Club at the moment is that I am supposed to be on a diet and really do not need any more excuses to eat cake!
As Paul Auster says, you realize that you’re just not fit for anything else. Yes, I can do a lot of other things well. Producing, for one. I loved to galvanize teams and get everyone to the finish line on time and on budget. I had a talent for it; in fact, I was promoted to a Vice Presidency of Production because I was that good at it.
Another friend (Tony Sharpe) wrote me "His horse was called Oliver. In his guise as Reverend Padgett at Shibden once, he was ranting about all the Popery. I said "Dave, all this potpourri?" He said "Yes, I'm sick of these scented flower petals."
The friction within the ANC tri-alliance is evident and Julius Malema is not going to take the onslaught against him lying down.
indoor playground
If you’ve never had boeuf bourguignon, it is a very pleasant dish. I enjoy the tang of the wine, and the mushrooms and onions. If you have an orange Le Creuset casserole, you can truly feel you are cooking with Julia (and Julie).
Update 12-24-11 - Time's Up!!! I'm drawing the winners TODAY -
I’ve been on an unofficial hiatus for a few weeks, but I think it’s time that I take a break from posting here for about a month. So I’m going on an ACTUAL hiatus, and I’m going to be doing some digital journal-type writing to get back into the swing of consistency (which I lack in).
I woke up crying and then I wrote this and I’m still crying as I type these words. It is the first time he’s come to me in a dream and it’s almost five months now. It feel so weird and hurts so much not to have seen him for five months. I wish I could have him back. I wish he never got old. I wish I didn’t have to make that horrible, awful decision which I never wanted to have to make and never want to make again.
Wow! You all still know how to party! That sounds like an incredible 4th of July!!! Barbeque and 5K races and marching band and family and fireworks and camping and David Archuleta...sounds like it was great! Don´t worry...Sister Grant and I did stop for a few minutes to remember the 4th of July. We even sang the Star Spangled Banner for the members at lunch!...but you know, it´s super hard to be patriotic when wearing 6 layers of think wool sweaters and still feeling like your fingers are freezing!! haha, it was hard for me to imagine all of you back at home enjoying the beautiful Utah summer! haha, though the muddy camping trip sounds like it could have gone a little better :) Fun though!
Well we sent it over to a lovely chap across the road who loves restoring and doing up bikes. Whilst it was there I rummaged about on the internet to find its original colour and I also looked in family albums for the photo of my parents sitting on the bike on their wedding day, my Mum was only 18 in this photo :-) I am loving the fact that their wedding reception was in my Nan & Grandads garden along with tents put up for the party and guests to stay in afterwards.
Anyways, as I was cleaning my fucking shit hole of a mess, I decided to open up the overwhelming flow of the past. I keep a few things, just faint objects in my life. Meaningless to anyone but myself. They represent everything that matters to me. People dead, alive. Parts in my past. Hopes for the future.
This amazing documentary, all two hours of talking heads and graphs, is a totally compelling explanation of how the recession came to be, and the men who so skilfully engineered it, raking in billions as they did.
This pin said to cut up letters from different places and put them in a box for your children to use to spell messages. Last time I checked that was called a ransom note.
In 2009, a proposed class action against Merck, based on ERISA claims surrounding Vioxx valuation, the Federal Court Judge made a fascinating “zombie” remark that explains a kind of zombie jurisprudential theory or zombie judicial philosophy.
I made 2 of these sponges
11-Red Rain
I was so excited that I was going to get to use my new toy... and you know what... ITS FREAKING AWESOME!!!! I love it, I love the plumber who finally got it working for me. I don't know how I did 2 years of cloth without it...
Another little project I worked on, with the help of a friend with a Cricut, was this happy birthday banner. She cut out the letters and "frames" from white cardstock and I used various yellow scrapbook papers for the backing. I used yellow, black and white ribbons to connect them together.
And guess what? If you were not the lucky winner in the video...you are still a winner today! Yep, you heard me! Recently, one of my favorite bloggers offered a giveaway and had like three winners, and she was so sweet to send the rest of us (like 10 people) some goodies too! That was the sweetest thing ever. She sent awesome RAKS, too! Well, I would like to do the same thing because I was really touched by that gesture and because I appreciate you all so much. It won't' be anything over the top, but it will be a small token of my appreciation for you! And, I don't know about you, but I just like receiving happy mail! So if you all will send me your snail mail I will get a little something something out to you this week....
These were some of the comics titles that I noticed while scanning the books on the contributors’ shelves: Bride of the Water God, Wilson, Kirby Five-Oh!, Akira, The Complete Far Side, The World of Charles Addams, Peanuts: A Golden Celebration, The Complete Cartoons of The New Yorker, Death Note, more Tintin, Y: The Last Man, Dark Horse’s Achewood collections and Alan Moore’s Swamp Thing.
The scary part came on Monday. At the release event. When I had to stand up and explain XX in 5 minutes without heistation, deviation or repetition. As I got to my feet I sent a glass smashing to the floor. At least it got the attention of the various hacks and freeloaders, sorry, invited guests. I hope I didn't confuse them too much with my tale of Pale Mild, Burton and the code of X's.
So what say you? Tell me you're spring nesting too, cause I bet you are =)
By Justin McCahren
Mermaid Tail: Glitterati– Mesh mermaid tail – lilac (Pose Faire) (Warning: the seams on the mesh had to be photoshoped not to appear, since it only comes in one size and the fitting never covered it properly even with a lot of shape tweaking)
The Stellar Magnitude System by Alan M. MacRobert
It was the 100th test match at the SCG and no player had ever scored 300 at that ground. In fact, only three men had previously managed 250 and two of those scores happened before Sir Donald Bradman had made a test century.
Just a quick post to let you know that I didn't forget to draw the winner of my fabulous prize draw on Friday. I had Miss 7 draw the winner's name, under strict supervision I might add! Congratulations to Kim who was absolutely stunned when we arrived on her doorstep not only with her order, but with that big bag of goodies as well. She said we made her day!
If you’re going to smoke go in your house, lock the door behind you, and smoke to your heart’s content. But don’t do it in the park! You don’t want to expose the squirrel birds, turtles, and little kids to your second-hand smoke.
“Thanks for your feedback. It’s wonderful to hear about your success. What specifically has improved during our work together? Were you able to measure the difference?”
The Chadar Trek: here you will enjoy nthe ultimate delight of the trekkers as you have to trek over the frozen Zanskar River. There are many other treks also for trekkers.
Yes, I KNOW about the whole Brazilian wax things and the pubes shaved into lightning bolts, but are we really coloring the hair down there?
They were what you may call "Profound" .....
There’s just one problem: Not only are the junta’s members still occupying Mali’s political stage, but they may have no intention of leaving it anytime soon.
Richard was texting and calling every few minutes to let me know what was happening but there was no sign of Paul or Poppy. By this time I was feeling sick with worry. He’d been gone so long and it was dark out. He could be anywhere. Hurt. Abducted. Dead, even. Every possible scenario goes through your mind when you don’t know where your child is, because even though he’s a grown man, he’s still just a child in so very many ways. And not being able to speak would mean that he wouldn’t even be able to ask somebody to tell him the way home.
Rating 22
Today is the start of a new challenge for The Ribbon Girls who are not only two of the sweetest and loveliest girls on the planet but also sell the most delish ribbons!
October 1st
Buchanan goes on to provide other examples of the rhetoric problem, but this will suffice for present purposes.
I have one small complaint (and it really is small because I read this in less than three days). This novel is based on THE SCARLET LETTER and I wish the similarities had been a bit more subtle. The main character is Hannah Paine (Hester Prynne), there is an adulterous affair with a man of the cloth, a “daughter” named Pearl, and lots of red. If none of that rings a bell, you need to revisit your junior year of high school and dust of your cliff notes (which obviously you used instead of reading the book). It’s a great book. You should really read it this time.
As reported in the Simply-docs blog entry of 21st March 2012, the percentage of women on the boards of FTSE 100 companies has steadily been rising since Lord Davies recommended that the top 100 companies should have 25% female board representation by 2015.
It's nearly a compliment, though, that someone as seemingly deranged as this guy thinks I have problems. I hope he will recover from being mesmerized by the evils of television, though, and go on to live a healthy life.
22. Brown Ram – 1 gold + Exalted with Ironforge
The crowd broke through the exit door as soon as they were safely inside the car. Camera flashes went off in their faces.
h = c f g c
You can learn all the techniques for composition and how to write a grammatically correct sentence, of course. You can learn how to properly format a screenplay or a play, for instance. You can certainly learn clarity and how to get your point across without its real meaning being muddled or misconstrued.
I love picking vegetables from my garden, and my son loves picking berries. Just when I thought that all the berries were gone, he managed to find a big blackberry and a small strawberry.
Right after she left I was going to get dressed and I told Jeremy that I thought my water had broken. So, he went to get Kaye for assistance. She came back and had me check the fluid to see if it was amniotic fluid and it was, it was rather obvious by this point. It was a slow leak at first but a consistent one. She said we could still go for a walk and even suggested it. After I was ready we gathered our 4 children and went exploring. Right out back of the birth center is a beautiful waterfall. We hiked up river of the water fall. The farther you go up the more water falls you see as the river goes up into the canyon.
I was 20. I'd not long split up with someone and I was feeling fairly sorry for myself, unattractive, unloved, slightly unhinged.
After chasing her around for a good 15 minutes, she decided that I had had enough cardio. She came towards me looking rather remorseful for putting me through all that. I didn’t care. After putting her collar back on her neck, I affectionately rubbed the thick fur on her back and we headed back home; Cess and I.
As he lay on his back semi-conscious; I looked down at him, and said,
Now, your computer starts generating a lot of heat as the CPU performs huge computational processes to generate really really big prime numbers. Computers cannot create “Truly Random” things very well. To make stuff more random-like, entropy is introduced by sampling a lot of unrelated things. Simply put, do other stuff on your computer to make your key (in theory) more random-like.
Yesterday I had lofty goals of being productive and getting everything done that I have been putting off for the past few weeks, but why cave in and be productive when you can go moose chasing up in the mountains with the fall colors all around.
The original house we wanted fell through, but running parallel was
You can receive complimentary proofs of your commencement photos by email without any obligation for purchase. Registration cards will be available on Thursday at the Senior Brunch – please stop by the table.
up to him for being so strong and capable of
Colchester
So if you want to make someones day, one of these adorable stuffed animals would be a good choice. I have to tell you that the sheep is just too darn cute!
I don't know how, but somehow I found out about a lady who really (like, really really) wanted a carrier - she had tried at every stocking for a long long time, and then gave up. I felt really sad - I felt touched that she had tried for so long, and just thought that there should be more joy in the world.. So I contacted her and said 'Hey, I will make you a carrier' and she said 'Yes' (ok, she said more than that but you get the gist.)
But the Entrance Hall of Merriman Park needed a nice ceiling paper so off to the mall I went.
xxxoo
Who is this book for? First and foremost it was for himself. Publication was an afterthought. The best books I find are those written purely to exhaust the author’s need to get something out of his head and onto paper. Do I think that this is purely for those who have lost a child or even a loved one? No. Like the Amazon reviewer I’m not sure they would find any comfort in it but what they might find are the words to articulate how they feel. Not everyone is gifted with words. They feel the ache but apart from crying or lashing out they have no way of communicating it. And so they paw through books of quotes looking for other people’s words to say what they have no words to say. Thomése may ultimately be saying that words are inadequate but considering what he was working with – these wholly inadequate words – what he says is actually more than adequate.
--high taxes in New York City
Dr. Carl Maia (Antonio Moreno) discovers a fossilized hand in the Amazon and is blown away at how unlike anything else it is. He recruits ichthyologist David Reed (Richard Carlson) to go with him on an expedition. They set sail down the Amazon along with the Captain Lucas (Nestor Paiva), Dr. Reed’s girlfriend Kay (Julia Adams), his boss Dr. Mark Williams (Richard Denning), and colleague Dr. Thompson (Whit Bissell). There are also a couple of the boats crew members who exist solely to provide the film with a body count. They soon discover the titular Black Lagoon, which is home to the also-titular creature (Ben Chapman on land, Ricou Browning in the water). When the so-called Gill-Man is discovered, Dr. Reed wants to observe it in its natural habitat. Dr. Williams wants to capture it for fun and profit. Meanwhile the Gill-Man seems to have its sights set on Kay. Terror ensues.
STUPID SHITTY SHU HAVING TO KILL MANA AND GAI AT THE SAME TIME
1. Leave the situation.
Walter is a German ex prisoner-of-war who has no family or friends in this country, and who has, over the years, alienated the rest of our neighbourhood. Apparently they don’t take too kindly to being asked whether they are pregnant again or just fat, and are not buttered up by a half eaten packet of eclairs.
As it turns out the rocker frame was just screwed into the base of the old rocking chair seat, so I fixed the rocker frame to the base of the office chair, which just happened to have a thick piece of plywood in the base, perfect for fixing to.
And distance, screams ration through the fog.
So today I am headed out the the beauty supply store to pick up new hair care products, and to the grocery store to buy food for the week. Since, I’m new in the kitchen I like to buy food only for a weeks time, any longer I get sick of eating the same thing, and I begin to cheat (going to fast food, mom and pop diners, or restaurants). Money is super tight and I can’t afford to cheat!
-I see announcements of boy or girl and photos of growing baby bumps, and I feel a twinge of sadness that those days are over for our family.
James Murdoch: “I think Mr Hunt had said personally he didn’t see any issues … there’s no special information in there.”
Bede Mahon is one of Tytntynder’s favourite sons and was runners up best and fairest in 2011. The rivalry with the Swans is especially intricate for Mahon and his family, because he has family connections within both clubs. Mahon’s first cousin is Hugh Foott, (coach of Swan Hill), he has another cousin playing for the Swans, his uncle is President of the Swans, while his Aunties avidly run the Swan Hill canteen. Mahon, his Mum, Dad and two older brothers have ensured the Dogs are represented at family get-togethers. “It is always so good to try and have the bragging rights at family shows. No matter what, when we play we are all desperate to win. But at the end of the day we are always family,” Mahon says.
Yeah? Well so would a fuck of a lot of people, only they can't, because they have to pay a fuck of a lot of tax, apparently so that the state can give it to fat people, to spend on lottery tickets.
After an amazing first night out with our international friends in the Berlin nightlife, we started the next day a bit delayed. We saw many well-known landmarks and impressive buildings in the following days but one highlight were doubtless a few of the famous historical sight-seeing places.
The story is that after passing through eight Jhanas, successive stages of meditative awakening, and after many trails, Siddhartha awoke fully to the nature of reality and stood up from under the bodhi tree, to continue with life, teaching others about the insights he had gained and teaching all he met the path and techniques awaken, as he had experienced. However, before he left, he paused to look with gratitude at the Bodhi tree, without blinking, for one week. And then spent another walking back and forth from the Bodhi Tree.
Here is the new Linky for all your giveaways - please be sure to list the date your giveaway is ending!
You know.... beautiful, golden trophies for....
A donation box will be sitting beside me, and anyone who feels inspired to feed the artist are invited to give anything they can. Crafts, second hand books, and writing handouts or booklets can also be purchased after the session.
I have been giving considerable thought lately to the administration of authority. I have been grieved by some of the things I have seen done in it’s name, and have been pondering questions and Scriptures. What is a healthy expression of authority? How is it that Scriptures are employed to back up practices or systems that are clearly abusive? Where is the balance between boundaries and anarchy? How can Truth be proclaimed to set captives free from both slavery and rebellion?
1. Took my 7 year old niece shopping for her 1st pair of Toms shoes. Apparently, all the kids in her school have them and her favorite uncle (my hubby) promised her a pair if she got a great report card. She’s in 1st grade, people. It ain’t that hard. ;)
i'm convinced i'm an experiment project - was put on new meds and put 35lbs on in 1 yes ONE month - so there goes my Dr's idea that i had an eating disorder (which i have battled in the past, but been free of for years) - each time i get on new meds i get sicker and sicker - i won't go into details - but it's been a bad quality of life on these meds so i have decided to stop them - on a positive note - i finally joined a gym - i'm now a proud member of Bally's and have a personal trainer for 3 months - so rock solid body this summer here i come!
Last weekend I was on Amazon ordering a new water filter for our fridge (they really do sell everything), and they were so helpful to inform me that if I spent $4 more, I'd qualify for free shipping! Well, that's like throwing money away, right?! So a quick search for sunburst mirrors brought up tons of options.
for you are with me;
In short, know that you will love and lose BIG. You will make great memories everywhere you go.
I had just taken a photo of hubby when a woman came along and offered to take
Dark Horse Brewing Company
Erasure Sometimes UK
“Damn nurses won’t let me have my CAKE!” he screamed into the air, not looking us in the eye.
Fear Not True Believer: One theory is that had the documentary crew believed that Satan was real and had a hand in this, they would have been spared. Because they questioned the Devil, they ultimately questioned God and suffered the consequences. Cotton and the crew believe they are better than these backwood hicks and their pride is their ultimate downfall.
Total copies returned during the reporting period
Love, Danii.
For the first 8 weeks, I'll focus on hills: uphills, downhills, repeats, etc. By week 4, I'll start adding in some marathon goal pace runs. I'll close out the first 8 weeks in Texas by running the Cowtown Half-Marathon. For the remainder of my training, I'll swap out hill workouts for speed work but continuing to run the North Side of Central Park where all the hills are since the Madrid course seems to have a bit of a down hill though the official course hasn't been posted.
So without further delay, get that bundt pan ready and head on over to her site for this incredible recipe.
Anti-riot FRU + tear gas + water cannons?
She said she would,
"I don't see why I can't pose for photos like any other male model."
looking for a bone
“Now again I will give you the context. After context you tell me that yet you believe that Jesus (pbuh) is Almighty God or not.”
As of early 2003, the University of Kansas Medical Center is conducting a study of the effectiveness of adding four well-known antioxidants (vitamins A, C, E, and beta-carotene) to conventional chemotherapy for ovarian cancer.
Growing up my sister and I were obsessed with watching Winnie the Pooh: Too Smart for Strangers. The VHS tapes seems to have disappeared, and according to Amazon the DVD of it costs close to $70 (it is considered vintage... REALLY?!). But lucky for all our cutie patooties, I was able to find the full movie of Winnie the Pooh: Too Smart for Strangers of YouTube. Yay for modern technology... and possible piracy? Hope it's legal : ) Sorry in advance if it's not...
Blue Labour, on the other hand, has been pushing against the same door from the opposite direction, and is concentrating its effort rather more on the social argument, precisely because its economic argument was always likely to go down well (save the odd ridiculous misreading – take a bow, Billy). It is essentially a reverse process of what Blond has been ateempting with the Tories, and its success is not unrelated to the fact that its prime target is a clique and a philosophy which, many would argue, is and never has been mainstream in the Labour movement anyway. To put it in (overly) simple terms, Glasman has had to convince a party to return to its natural roots on economics and look more closely at its social doctrines (the two intertwine, though the latter in particular has included an analysis of the role of the state), whilst Blond has had to move the Conservatives on two fronts, that being the party on economics, and the leadership on social conservatism.
The acting was pitiful, with more clichés and pot-holes than you can poke a stick at; the scenes where we see Kyson-Lee “possessed” made him look like he was stoned; and with even less than notable actors and one-hit wonders (for those who may recall Tiffany, the one-hit wonder of the 90′s); This movie, to be frank, was nothing what I expected.
The Guardian sought to talk about whether the coverage of the Yeates case was rendering the Contempt of Court Act 1981 “threadbare” and “in disarray”. It is reassuring, therefore, to see that when the CPS is proactive in its protection of the justice system, as it was in this instance, that the public and the organisations who are affected will respond.
Whether it is in person, over the phone make sure to always have a proper consultation so you can get a feel for the plastic surgeon’s personality and practice. You want to make sure you feel comfortable working with them before you decide to pull the trigger on your plastic surgery. Your surgical plan involves more than just your “wish list”. Your lifestyle, family, career, and surgical goals all contribute to your surgical plan and there are no one-size-fits-all surgical plans. Make sure these items are discussed and considered when designing the perfect plan for you.
not worthy of the effort...
My house is filthy.
None knew what lay inside or their size
I was super excited to team up with Udderly Smooth and try out some of their products, Udderly Smooth Vitamin & Cream, Udderly Smooth Udder Cream, Udderly Smooth Shea Butter Foot Cream and Udderly Smooth Body Cream Samples. I was very impressed with the results! Each product performed wonderfully leaving my skin feeling soft and silky, without leaving it greasy or coagulated feeling.
12am – Angelus followed by Good Room Games. Silent Scrabble with the Child Who Can be Seen and Not Heard, Speed Knitting and Getting The Messages for Mammy. Refreshments available from the lovely ladies of Scone Central.
The poem for the Castle Museum is divided into three parts, Death, Survival and Perseverance. The Batoni is sumptuous in its way, tragedy as a set piece with cello. Mortality with posies. What is love if not fear of losing? Love is in fact mortality, so mortality lies at the bottom of the family, as it did for mine when I was a child.
Don’t get me wrong, I love digital content. It’s incredibly convenient, reduces clutter and waste, and opens doors to smaller creators who would never have the budget for a large-scale “hard-copy” release. But its slippery slope undeniably leads down into a whirling mass of razor blades. The worst-case scenario is that we’d live in a disc-free world only to find that while we buy all these movies and games (or for that matter, music and books), we don’t own them.
Skin - Blush, Sunkissed Pink, Coral, Cinnamon
"can I have a few more minutes of your time today?"
I took my first trip last week to Stampin and Scrappin which is a local store about an hour and a half away from me. Kathy had some of the most beautiful papers and helped me to select all of the papers that I used. Lots from BasicGrey and BoBunny and some lovely 8.5 x 11 papers that I do not know the vendor of. Kathy is wonderful and the service was fabulous. So much nicer than the big box stores.
I don't care how talented you are, no decent convo
God blessed Man with Abundance
But God demonstrates his own love for us in this: While we were still sinners, Christ died for us (Romans 5:8).
Flood waters rising and ???
Gilbert jumped onto his lap.
"But I don't want to go among mad people," Alice remarked.
Here is a brief glimpse inside my head almost every night after my girl has gone to bed....
Richard Dennis Allen, 31, New York, N.Y.
“I could not do anything,” she continued, a deep sadness hardening her features. “Your grandmother escaped with you, and hid you from the guilty fear with which he must’ve looked for you for years to come.”
Pour continuer sur le thème de Noël, voici enfin le bloc 6 du quilt de Lynette Anderson " Christmas Fun" :
“For I know the plans I have for you,” declares the LORD, “plans to prosper you and not to harm you, plans to give you hope and a future.” Jeremiah 29:11
And P.S.: See me when you turn 53. I can imagine what you'll look like at that age.
Every new car comes with a standard warranty, which can last from 3 years (36,000 miles) up to 10 years (100,000 miles). As you’re filling out papers to finish your purchase, you might be asked to purchase an extended warranty. If you already have a 10 year warranty, you really won’t need to worry about it as you’ll be covered for quite a long time. But if you have a 3 year warranty and plan to keep it around for more than that, you may be thinking about purchasing an extended warranty. I personally don’t have recommendations on whether to get it or not because it will really depend on each experience. You never know when a car will and won’t have issues. But if you decide to go for the extended warranty, you CAN negotiate those terms. Every month that someone pays for extended warranty and don’t use it, its money in the dealerships pocket. This is another way they make money. That’s why they are willing to negotiate, because even at a lower price, it’s still income to them.
For the yogurt - lemon sauce
500
Under the ‘something for something’ mantra that the Opposition is adopting, these benefits would surely be scrapped – leaving many extremely vulnerable people with no support whatsoever. But rather than say this – which would be unthinkable – Byrne simply skipped over this rather inconvenient truth.
My friend is in a contest. Check out her awesome entry video below because I know you will be motivated to click the link HERE and rate her video 5 out of 5!
Kaleb is strong, he encourages others with his beautiful smile and he is a fighter.
Whare drunken Charlie brak's neck-bane:
I have written on and off since I was a child. I used to take episodes of a rambling tale set in Russia to school on a weekly basis and make my friends read them. I also wrote a few ghost stories and then there was that little hand written, hand illustrated magazine called 'Quest' that survived for two issues.
When I looked at him he was down on one knee and had this gorgeous ring out.
This Ground Which Was Secured At Great Expense: It is 1914 and The Great War is underway. When the call to arms comes, Nicholas Southwell won’t be found hanging back. It’s a pity he can’t be so decisive when it comes to letting his estate manager Paul Haskell know what he feels before he has to leave for the front line. In the trenches Nicholas meets a fellow officer, Phillip Taylor, who takes him into the unclaimed territory of physical love. Which one will he choose, if he’s allowed the choice?
As high as heaven is over the earth,
I was concerned that it would be an emotional day for her, and I am sure it was, but not in the way I imagined. It was emotional for me because I was able to witness once more, the truly strong woman that my mother is. She is a living example to me and my sisters, and my daughter, that whatever adversities we may need to face throughout our lives, it is unnecessary to allow them to keep us from making each day our best day. An inspiration. Deep breath.
So we went out to some event called Bump, at a club called Plan B. It’s such a relaxed club, all the girls are in trainers and the vibes so nice, it’s just people who go out to have a good time. No trouble, no drama, no screw faces, just good vibes. So I wore high waisted leggings, a cropped top and my converse … outfit was cute enough for that venue. Well let me say, it was the best night I have had out in years. We laughed, we drunk, we flirted, guys were digging the kid …
I love Chicken Pot Pie and Chicken and Rice because they are delicious one dish suppers. I also love them because they involve just one chicken. Yes, I said ONE chicken! I buy a whole Publix Greenwise chicken because I think it has lots of good chicken flavor. I know it's a little more expensive that a standard whole chicken, but I think the flavor is worth it.
Or I need to buy a winning lotto ticket and solve all my problems.
Journals have become public now. We’re trying to find our place with words in a world that has lost its magic. We’re trying to heal from the rent of grief in a world apathetic to everything but its own interests. Words still have the power to heal or hurt and does more damage than any weapon.
enter the best scones, the last minute rescuers of morning baking conundrums: oat scones via orangette via standard baking co. in portland, me. i made a few changes, really just the addition of frozen blueberries and lemon zest to give them a little more swagger. no pictures though. the morning was too hectic, the scones were gone too quickly. i will say though that the lone scone still left when i got home in the afternoon was just as good as the first ones out of the oven–not dry, not hardened, just dense with butter and cream and perfectly crumbly.
DAY 7: Make Gingerbread houses
I feel so super tired and lazy today. I’m a bit worried that I’ll give in to my laziness once I get home and skip out on my workout today. I have to get motivated and stay on track….leave work, get home, let dogs out, dress for workout, get my water, hit play. “Nobody regrets working out. They just regret NOT working out”.
The rare and poignant letter, written by this young Scot, one hundred years ago, has been recently discovered by record keepers at the National Records of Scotland as part of their effort to update and digitize thousands of wills and testaments from 1902 to 1925 to be added to the ScotlandsPeople genealogy website. The documents will be shown from April 16 until May 25 at The ScotlandsPeople Center in Edinburgh.
I’ve touched on this subject before: manifestation. When this morning’s windfall occurred, I realized I hadn’t intentionally been manifesting my desires for quite some time. Sure, I think wistfully about these things in passing, but it has been weeks—months, even—since I sat down and made a list of what I want to receive, and sent it with a grateful nod into the unknown. WE SHOULD BE DOING THIS EVERY WEEK! It doesn’t take much time out of your day, and it is so important. Think about it this way: the planet is getting more and more populated every day. The Universe has never been so inundated with requests. If you don’t put your nose to the grindstone, you might not get what you desire. Believe me, it’s worth it and you deserve it!
We blessed our new baby girl in church last week! It was a beautiful occasion we were able to share with our dear family and friends.
The Apostle John was between the ages of 93 and 97 when the angel came and gave him this prophecy. John was the only one of the disciples that
Losing weight
We all need to call time out, let the authorities conduct an investigation that should have been conducted in the first place and then re-start the dialogue. After all, the decision will not be a he said-he said conflict. In the end it will be all about what the physical evidence truly says about what really happened on that night and in the context of the Florida ‘Stand Your Ground’ law, regardless if Zimmerman was the aggressor, did he, when he believed to be losing the fight that he obviously instigated, shoot Martin justifiably – according to the law.
2. Heat the 2 Tb of oil and melt the butter in a heavy medium-size saucepan over medium heat. Add the flour and whisk for 1 minute. Gradually whisk in the milk. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat. Reduce the heat to medium and simmer until the sauce thickens slightly, whisking often, about 5 minutes. Whisk in the nutmeg. Cool slightly. Transfer half of the sauce to a blender*. Add the sage and rosemary and blend until smooth. Return the sauce to the sauce in the pan and stir to blend. Season the sauce with salt and pepper, to taste.
Oh, and as Bam Caruso always used to say on the back of those "Circus Days" compilation albums - you will be able to detect popping and crackling in this mp3, but it would be foolish to ignore this medium merely because of the fragility of earlier storage systems.
If I go away for the weekend and eat someone else's food, even the thickener they use in their sauces might send me vomiting through the night. Eating a little later, or a little earlier, not being able to eat little and often, (because most people don't do that) all play havoc. Too much cream or too little salt, too much starch or not enough protein. Even the change in water can be enough.
I was fun to knit, and became cosy and organic as it grew and grew. I worked on 1 metre long double pins, but by the end it was quite a struggle to manipulate all the stitches; so although I still have some yarn over, I decided it was big enough. I probably have enough to make a hat with the leftovers.
As fars as the products, the new shapes of beads stones, pendants and more and more, and the new colors pleased a lot my personal aesthetic.
Headway, the brain injury charity, is promoting Action for Brain Injury Week from the 14th – 20th May. Acquired Brain Injury is becoming recognised as a growing problem: brain injuries often leave no external evidence, the symptoms of a brain injury may be hidden, and as a result they are often mis-diagnosed or not picked up on at all.
I made this card for Splitcoast's sketch challenge SC382 yesterday.
He calls Mrs. Claus for the backup sleigh
I'm getting excited for Life Is Good. I had such a hard time transitioning back to real life last time......really missed it..... so am really trying to prepare myself. It looks like I'll be getting a ride from a local friend that is coming from my area for the first time with her family (including a new baby!!) and then K will come down on Saturday to hang out for a day or 2... and then we'll drive back together. We can't both be off work......it just can't happen anymore. (the birth will be an exception and then she's only taking 2-3 weeks off)
Throw it away or boil it!
Whichever way I look at it Mr Therapist is right, I have 10 months of therapy left (where is the time going!) I need in the next 10 months to use the group therapeutically so I will benefit fully and that is not just during the next 10 months but also when this therapy ends. If I want to move on to pastures new and hopefully be a, “Recovered Borderline,” I cannot let myself screw up and more importantly, I cannot let others screw things up for me, I have to be more assertive and put myself first and not the needs of others.
Today, it is still hurting, but not nearly as bad, so I am going to work tomorrow, but will leave early for my dr appointment.
A mentor I had at work once told me that I was like a terrier: once I got my teeth into something, I wouldn't let it go until I was done with it. Some might say I'm stubborn; I prefer tenacious.
Many of you non-British gentle readers may be wondering, what is summer pudding? Well, it is kind of like a fruit pie, except instead of a baked flaky crust you have a soft, juice-drenched bread shell, and instead of a bubbly stewed fruit center you have an assortment of fruit that has been only lightly cooked to bring out its juices. A light, refreshing dessert.
(I'm sure some of you receive the same emails.)
They are ready to be printed (in a high photo quality for the
Eryn might be the single witness, if only she'd wake up! I clamped my lips together and threw my voice, "Eehhnnnn!"
So here are the two items of inspiration, which also came with tutorials.
The show was recorded at the Gallery of Modern Art Brisbane in Jan 2009
A perfect end to what has honestly been a most arduous day after a night of improper sleep. I am now listening to one of my favorite songs of the moment by Tedeschi Trucks Band. It's called Learn How to Love. It's great-- bluesy, rocky, with awesome lyrics, sung with incredible feeling.
Things I ought to do after the climax:
The front door opened and I froze.
Mari Ciella Angelique
$2501 - $5000 = 14%
Once again an artist that defend an old media and a stupid system just because he is in the hands of bussinesmen that is so afraid loosing money that they actually fox it all up and loosing even more… They should try learn the same hard lesson that the music industry…
The environmental revolution—a Communist agenda—is being resisted piece by piece by scientists and others who no longer will submit to its utterly false “science” and its UN-inspired Agenda 21 plans to impose control over all aspects of life on planet Earth. A June Rio conference will largely abandon the fear-mongering of global warming in favor of “sustainability”, a matrix of controls that will enslave the world’s population with the worst totalitarian precepts since the rise of Communism and Nazism in the last century.
The media is calling the new look Auschwitz Chic. To me it’s beyond pathetic. In fact, I think anyone behind this marketing ploy and anyone who buys this filthy tee should be forced to have a number tattooed on their arm.
8. Eclipse
Stories about NASA and UFOs are legion, as are photos, films, and videos. One of the most cryptic-- yet potentially most damning-- concerned the Apollo 11 crew.
Then, he did something that made my heart drop. Sitting at Mom's outdoor patio table, in the little yellow chairs with the cute cushions, surrounded by perfectly pruned rose bushes and plants, he raised to the side, grinned his evil little grin, and ripped the loudest and most inappropriate fart ever.
People probably think I'm all studious and shit. #ha #hahaha
I said,"I'll always cuddle you if you want, but I think when you get big you won't want mama to cuddle you."
Level 25: MP Cost: 30, Damage: 335%, Number of Attacks: 4, 35% to inflict darkness on the enemy and lower it’s accuracy by 25% for 90 seconds. The last attack is critical.
It wasn’t until after the referendum in 1995 that divorce was finally recognised in Ireland, so it is perhaps not surprising that we still have the lowest divorce rate in the EU with just 0.8 divorces per 1,000 per annum, that’s about 3,500 in total each year. And presumably each of these gives rise to the need for a new dwelling. We’ve always had annulment and separation of course and it might be that these are now seeking divorces instead. The EU average divorce rate is 2.1 per 1,000 andBelgium has the highest rate of 3.0 per 1,000 per year.
I want to instill in them things like giving up their seats for older people, opening doors for others, speaking kindly, making eye contact, responding to greetings, not reacting in anger, and giving up the right to have the biggest piece, the first place, the best prize.
I pray that you find the courage to speak clearly, even if you are trembling.
on your head of peach fuzz.
Laid back Sunshine reggae DK
In London, white children now account for only 20%, and I’ll say that again, only 20% of the school population. And England’s other city schools are going precisely the same way in precisely the same manner. The non-indigenous birth rate now averages an extraordinary 35% nationally, which realistically means 70-80% in the cities alone, thus consigning indigenous English children in Birmingham, Bradford, Oldham, Luton, Leicester and Slough to an ethnic minority in their own land - a fate awaiting English children in all our cities within a decade, and the entire country before 2030.
What might be most noteworthy is this week's poll is how bad Obama's numbers are with a few key and usually dependable Democratic constituencies. He's under water in union households at 44/47. He's also under water with voters under 30 at 45/48. The Northeast tends to a pretty dependable region for Democrats but Obama's under water there at 47/49. Obama's usually been able to hold his ground with female voters but he's under water with them too at 45/49. And even with African Americans his approval rating's down to 76%, about as low as we've ever found it.
cut you off.
What is the position of Islamic law on this public display?
I encourage you all to try the Walgreens Brand Health & Wellness Products. You will not be disappointed! To learn more about the products, you can "Visit the site for more information"
“No,” answers Isaac. “Mr. Joe threw leftovers from his lunch today over the fence. He made ravioli with chicken. Isaiah really liked it. I only ate a little. But, I think I will pass on the peas.”
Joseph Arellano
for granted, you take
2. Heat grill or grill pan to high; lightly oil grates. In a shallow dish, combine lime juice, ginger, and oil; season with salt and pepper. Add chicken and let marinate for no more than 5 minutes. Grill chicken until browned and opaque throughout, 1 to 3 minutes per side; transfer to a plate to cool.
She said she didn’t like the frosting on the cupcake. Which I found amusing since the night before she wouldn’t even touch the cake part, she was all about the frosting then. So trying to be helpful as she started to whine about not liking it, I did the only logical thing I could think of. I separated the cupcake so she could just have the cake. Apparently this was not an appropriate solution. She cried and screamed like I had tried to cut-off one of her fingers.
Then I made a fatal mistake. I talked to him.
Geek Husband: Honey, Dosa is so boring. It is simple and plain like the old text only Internet.
As you frequent readers of my blog may know, I was wait-listed for France, and, really, the odds of me getting off said wait list are next-to-none. Fine. Whatever. I’ll make another motherflipping plan.
In May I watched 3 friends graduate. I cried tears of pride and took pictures. I celebrated and toasted to the success of those I love. I also met TK at one of those celebrations. He took me out on our first date soon after and I knew that this man was for real. We became inseparable almost immediately. As perfect as he is for me, I don't think it would have happened like it did if I hadn't gone through those changes earlier in the year. I knew exactly who I was on the day TK took me out. I knew what I wanted and what I wouldn't accept; in myself and in those around me. I had erased all the meaningless men from my life and truly gave myself time to love me and be a better person. I was ready to find love and then it found me!
- If defeated in close combat by a Marine, Marines in base contact with the dead bug(s) take an automatic S3 hit (acid splash)
Wortland Wastes, or "No Beer Land", where the rugged desert mesas
pines, pines in mute horror,
And I was never a fan of Super Hoe.
Thank to to everyone who entered and please stay tuned for another fabulous vintage giveaway coming up in the next few weeks!!
I was a bit disappointed recently when two different pairs of socks came out of the laundry with damage. My lucky bike socks (pictures to come) suffered a small hole near the side of the toe, which was easily fixed. My beloved Koigus weren’t quite so lucky — I’m going to have to unravel part of one cuff and re-knit it. I guess there’s a lesson for me to hang onto my yarn remnants in case I need them for repairs.
on sale for just $1.37
to the orbit of a tiny moon.
Another remarkable family-related piece is an 8-minutes long piece ‘Candles’, this time letting Rufus speak to his mother, who passed away one year before his daughter Viva was born, expressing how his sorrow for her mother never ends, expressing ‘I tried to do all that I can. But the churches have run out of candles.’
MYSTERY JETS - Radlands
I don’t fully understand transgendered people. I accept them for who they are, but I don’t always get it in my head. That’s not to say though if I had a son of my own, I’d go through extremes to make sure he turned out the way I envisioned. I’d probably do all I could to make sure he got the love and support he needed. (Because, that’s what parents are supposed to do, right?) Right???
NABC Thunderfoot
I used to cry at night because I didnt want my mom to die. I didnt want to die. So back when I was 7 or 8, I decided, I didnt want to die, or have anyone die I want the world to end and me be with my family. I still feel the same today, especially with all the talk of End Times. But with my faith, death is no longer scary. I just know I dont want to suffer, be in pain, I especially dont want my boys or family to see me suffer. So if I have to choose peacefully, in my sleep.
(5) NAMA may gain control of associated loans that have nothing to do with property eg business lending, fine wines, cars, helicopters, yachts. No account is taken for these loans.
At sixteen, she began competing in athletics (track and field) and before she turned seventeen, she was representing Canada in high jump. She continued to compete, breaking Canada's JR High Jump record (1.92m - 6' 3 1/2" for those metric-ly challenged). She attented University of Toronto, and Kansas State University - graduating with a BS degree in Kinesiology and beginning her Masters in Business.
they show that all things can still end with a kiss.
Methodological problems: defining exposures
Go for it, gal!
American Spanish and Sulphur Mustangs are direct descendants of wild Spanish horses and have little, if any, DNA from other horse breeds. They are highly intelligent with an innate sense of self-preservation and legendary endurance. The American Spanish Mustang comes in a full range of solid colors including black, bay, brown, chestnut, sorrel, grullo, zebra and red dun, buckskin, palomino, and cremello. Sulphur Mustangs are usually line-backed duns and grullos, but can have the color variations found in Spanish Mustang.
My little girl turns 1 today (2-15). I.cannot.believe.it. Seriously, are you kidding me? How could these 12 months fly by as fast as they did. To all the experienced mamas out there...you were right. Time flies. To be quite honest, it's very bittersweet for me. I don't really have a baby anymore, but I am so looking forward to all the fun times we're going to have together in the near future. Leah is absolutely amazing and probably the cutest one year old you'll ever feast your eyes on.
These are questions I have asked in country inns and in London clubs. I have asked stockbrokers and road sweepers, air pilots and bus conductors, policemen and politicians. But although they most of them hold definite views upon the subject they can give no reason for holding those views and their views show in extraordinarily wide variation.
This is an exciting time. The Shift is an exciting story. So let me repeat the punch line: What you think and how you choose to hold and direct your emotions, can and will alter how the Earth will change.
dead people?
You feel you have wisdom that others need to hear - Kath.
So yesterday, Dolores delighted me with many wonderful pictures. I especially loved the ones that showed familiar places in the neighborhood. The photos above were all taken in Carroll Park, first, when Dolores was a baby and then, as a teen and finally, as a mother. I hope you enjoy them as much as I did.
And today when we have completed twelve years together in this social contract, and the next generation is quietly developing in our cots. Our union is solely aimed at grooming them well now, with personal whims and fantasies sacrificed in the attar of life...
Aren’t they just the cheeriest Christmas songs you’ve ever heard! They are quite sad when you read the words but when they were played straight after Deck the Halls, it did sound quite funny and left me with the giggles. Anyway – I’m now interested to know if anyone else has ever heard bad Christmas songs? What are they – let me know!
For their part, the two brothers have not spoken to one another for many years. Tommy resents Brendan almost as much as he resents their father. He is a returned marine and war hero, but he is filled by an inexhaustible supply of anger at the world, whose source remains clouded until the final stages of the film. Brendan has no love for their father either, but this is the rational decision of a husband and family man who has been burnt by a bad bet one too many times.
Today was a gift, pure and simple! We are at the end of the first quarter at my school, and today was a day off school for "Fall Break"! And what a delightful day it was! I slept an hour longer, got outside for an early morning walk, and got a great deal done around the house to catch up on things! It was SUPER!
Following the explanation of the outbreak this book quickly becomes a tale of human endeavour amidst the surrounding carnage.
an arm? Not a hand. An arm. Wow. That is really a whole arm!
Level: Clr 1, Drd 1
As our kids get older, we are noticing that they are adopting who they follow and emulate on a regular basis. After a few episodes of “ ICarly” it became apparent that Sam was Anna’s hero, much to Eli’s dismay. Eli will copy anything that screams or makes noise on the TV and loves books that have that vibe. Even though he’s not real verbal yet, those things stick out for him and he readily copies. We worried early on in the adoption process about being matched with a boy, as we have gone on record as saying that it’s easier (and cooler) for a girl to have two dads than a boy. Just look at Rachel on “Glee” and how is she very vocal and sometimes very adamant about her parents and their sexuality. The slur “fag” is still the default taunt for playground harassment, and for a boy with two dads it’s open season, so naturally, we’re going to have to be aware of that as Eli gets older.
So, you will all have to party without me!
I’ve been a consultant before. I’ve also been an executive, who hired consultants. In my experience as a consultant and as an executive, the executive hires a consultant in order to deliver a pre-conceived message from another mouth that is not one’s own mouth. In my experience as a consultant, the consultant borrows your watch to tell you what time it is. In other words, one discerns the message which is being purchased, and one constructs the data to support it.
I know I can't stop this time. But what the heck is the point? If a freaking carpenter was putting together a building and every nail he put in someone else took out, how long would he try to build that damn house? Everything I do somebody undoes. What's the freaking point? I want to tear into my husband when he gets home, but is this really his fault? Who do you want to get mad at when you fail? Who do you blame? Your mom? Your kids? Your poor unsuspecting husband? Even if they could do more to help us, it doesn’t change the fact that this is hard. Changing the entire way our family operates is going to be difficult damn it. Excuse my language but I'm really pissed off. I know I need to do this for Christ, I know I need it
6 Selange 3:30
There is also a suspicion that the Bermuda triangle and the area where this pyramid was supposedly located may be some sort of “holy grounds” that is being protected by the fabled Atlanteans – that whatever crosses over the location is considered an offering… Others hypothesize that the pyramid can attract and collect cosmic rays, from the so called “energy field” or “quantum vacuum” and that this may have been used as an Altantean power plant (or whoever was around at the time). With the mystery still surrounding behind the Egyptian pyramids and the fact that the pyramidal structures seems to be found in almost all ancient cultures – its going to be hard to tell for certain the origin of this structure or if it truly exists (we haven’t been there yet so…) but be sure to check back frequently as we at Apparently Appare & BeforeItsNews.com try to bring you this kind of news BEFORE it makes it to the rest of the world. That’s why we are here. That is our mission.
I love the Dream Lord for, if nothing else, having a proper bow tie. Other than that he has a darkness in him that comes through as playful rather than sinister, but all the same being completely under his influence is a scary thought. His cutting remarks to the Doctor including having terrible hair, clothes designed by a first year fashion student and being an intergalactic wag give us an interesting insight into The Doctor's own mindset, as we find out The Dream Lord is just a personification of Doc's dark side.
I'm going to write more later, and hopefully have some more pics, but this is just to say that we're safe, and happy, and to thank you ALL for your good wishes.
The Upsetters - Bad Luck
Kinda an icebox cake, because this time I made my own wafer cookies, so I DID need to turn the oven on. But I usually make it with the wafers from cream filled cookies (Trader Joe Joe Joe’s are my favs). I scoop out the creme and save it for……..peppermint patties!! That’s right, nothing around here goes to waste….;) This cake couldn’t get any easier!
How soul destroying might it be for the government to take most of your €9.20, only to actually fine you – and in this case a double fine of €160 – just for making use of the product they allow outlets to sell? Maybe the government will decide that people who wish to smoke must apply for a licence? If so, they might use the following points to get them going; Applicants must
Others tell stories of true horror, of ending up in places and conditions I cannot begin to imagine what it must be like to have to live day in day out like that. It is vitally important that I listen to these people, "listen to the similarities not the differences" they say. I do, and I realise that; but for my extremely good fortune I would indeed have had to face the hardships some of them did.
Everywhere I go, I can never resist climbing to some high point to see a view. These steps in Geoje-do, South Korea represent the journey as discovery, as awakening. They seem hopeful and represent for me the possibilities that a journey holds.
and she says "bye sweetie" to the cat
Ruling that that vets groups could ask a federal judge to order changes in the system, the Ninth U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals declared, “the VA’s unchecked incompetence has gone on long enough.”
I saw this word and knew I had to use it right away. Boffiati- How do I put this? This is what a British/Italian couple call "fooling around".
Graphics
People will remember how much money we gave you. And we will remember what you did with it. Ungratefulness runs deep.
Honestly, when it comes to employers, I don’t always tell them. I feel like it’s a need to know basis, and I don’t like to get treated differently. That being said, if my absences become frequent or it I have to go home sick, in the case of an employer, I generally will tell them I have a chronic illness. By law, they can’t ask you more than that. Maybe I’m overly cautious, but I definitely don’t want an employer to treat me differently because I’m chronically ill.
With consumers making up only a twenty-fifth of the show's attendees this year, any such change is a long way off. But still, I have to wonder: could the BEA that Publishing Trends's correspondent imagined be around the corner? Would you welcome it, if so?
Note: I've not included any stories from other parts of the world besides the U.S., because if I did I'm sure we'd all be sitting here til we're grey. I've also tried to include stories from both the Republican and Democratic parties because both sides are totally doing it.
sliced almonds / pistachios 2 tbsp
When we graduated we had to perform a test to see whether or not we could function as “seers.” I was handed a 3 x 5 index card with a name on it, nothing more. I was then told to diagnose the illness this person had.
I left straight from the school and got back to Raleigh about 9 pm Sunday. A completely insane trip where I got to see so many fun people again and do so many fun things. And that was the big two from this weekend. Other random notes:
The director said that officers
Last night, I said, “If I am asleep in the morning, PLEASE don’t wake me up! I need to sleep!” I often have trouble sleeping.
welcome back daddy!
“When we meet suffering in person, in a moment of disappointment or anger or jealousy, we shouldn’t say to it, “go away, you’re disturbing me and making me feel bad.” Instead, we can look at it directly and say, “I’ve seen you before, and here you are again. I’ve avoided this moment, but now it’s time to face you straight on and clear up a few things. I know you’ve been helping me, so thank you for that. But now I’d like to say good-bye. I’m walking toward the path of liberation.”
We were playing in the sun
Said Palm Beach County Sheriff's Lt. Jay Hart, "The Mall doesn't put up with that tom foolery-buttcrap. His pants were down below his butt. No one goes to the mall and wants to see the crack of someone's butt."
Yep -typical unoriginal Hollywood movies, with the standard boilerplate insults against faithful Catholics, who are portrayed as petty and small-minded, while offering heart-warming sympathy towards those who flip off the Church. As Wilson states, the movie has a predictable conclusion as well – that Turner’s character realizes how wrong she was in trying to change her family. Which is a truism – we don’t have the power to change anyone. But the apparent message is: Catholics don’t love people for who they are; they only judge people on what they do. Well, some individual Catholics do act that way, but it’s not what the Church teaches. It’s not an either/or situation. As Catholics, we are called to love everyone precisely because of who they are – made in the image and likeness of God – and we are called to, yes, judge actions as either being sinful or not. That doesn’t give us license to act like jerks, or become self-righteous – because all of us are sinners. I suspect Turner’s character will be portrayed as being perfect and without sin – after all, she’s been nominated as Catholic Of The Year! - except by movie’s end, she’ll have an epiphany that her Big Sin was the sin of intolerance.
As a last note, I personally love buying from and supporting fellow Christians with their businesses. I was thrilled to read this on the back of the packaging my rulers came in...
the loneliest kind of lonely.
Thankfully it is much better this morning and I can actually turn my head and breathe without pain.... AH... nothing like health!
Yesterday we drove 300 miles over mountains and rivers to hear Oregon Old Time Fiddlers play in Grants Pass, Oregon, at Fruitdale Grange. These events take place often in and around the area of Medford, Grants Pass, and all around Oregon. An excellent crowd sat in at this show, and most people got up and danced whenever possible.
It'sssss baaaaaaack! The Friday Feature, too long absent from the ranks of my posts, has returned.... with a vengeance.
--1500 construction jobs
This is the type of afternoon that begs for a golden Diana camera and the reason I still love to shoot with this trusty old thing.
Another shocking aspect of the report is about the departments of Education, Health, Human Settlements, Public Works and Social Development - which account for 85% of provincial governments' annual spending. They were responsible for incurring R16.3-billion of the R20-billion in unauthorised, irregular as well as fruitless and wasteful expenditure.
So what is the checkpoint? It is the gate to the final hike to Machu Picchu. The gate does not open until 5:30, so everyone lines up like cattle outside the gates until it’s time.
3. Walk through the rocks with your shoes, save your feet, and the child.
Sift the flour and salt into a wide mixing bowl. Make a well in the middle of the flour and crack the egg into it. Pour milk over the egg, breaking it up with a fork. Gradually incorporate more and more flour into the egg/milk mixture and keep adding milk, little by little, until all the flour is used up, The slower and more considerately you do this, the fewer lumps you will have. Keep adding milk, until the mixture is the consistency of double cream. Beat well. Add cold water until it is the consistency of single cream. Set aside.
David Cameron is attempting to drive a wedge between different communities by linking Britain's multicultural society with terrorism and national security. His speech was made on the same day as the English Defence League brought its bigotry and violence to the streets of Luton. Mr Cameron's aim is simple as it is crude – to deflect the anger against his government's cuts from the bankers and on to the Muslim community. The prime minister is aping attacks by other European leaders like France's Nicolas Sarkozy, who passed legislation banning the veil, and Angela Merkel, who has also made statements denouncing multiculturalism in Germany. We believe our multicultural society and the respect and solidarity it is built on is a cause for pride, and reject any moves by this government to undermine and destroy it.
Here they are together, quite sweet I think. By the way do excuse the light/shade thing going on, I was doing this bit sat out on the patio under the parasol while the girls played in the paddling pool.
so what the fks new
So, they must have a name. I’ve thought long and hard about this. And I firmly believe, only one name fits best. It is…
Myth #2: I’ve read the book twenty-five times, all the spelling and grammar is perfect. WRONG! Spend the money on an editor. If you’re on a tight budget, solicit friends that will give you honest critiques. I actually have a whole posse of people that read mine, some are grammar fanatics, some avid readers and my actual editor is my aunt who was a creative writing teacher for more than thirty years. It’s safe to say that when I thought Meeting Destiny was ready to be published she still nearly drained the ink from her red
By inviting Common to the White House, Barack and Michelle Obama miss a golden opportunity
The Psalmist proclaims: “Great is the Lord and greatly to be praised, he is to be feared above all gods. For all the gods of the peoples are nothing; but the Lord made the heavens” (vv. 4-5) Through the liturgy and prayer, the faith of every generation is purified, the idols to which one sacrifices so easily in daily life are abandoned, and we pass from fear of the transcendent justice of God to a living experience of his love.
But what about online retailers and ebooks?
Shape into loaves. I know lots of people roll out their dough and then roll it up to shape their loaves. I take the easy way and just shape it using my hands. I don't really know how to explain it - I just learned from watching my mom.
The other day I was making a to-do list (I am the list queen). After I was done, I looked it over and realized every item had to do with my children’s writing career in some way, shape, or form. As impatient as I get, I realized I was living the writing life! That THIS - the writing plus everything on that check list, no matter how menial the task - is the writing life. That was an important revelation.
Someone please tell me this isn't a phase or lord a mercy a start to the ending of naps altogether.
The fun news? To honor gardens far and wide, you can get your green thumbs on our From the Garden set for 10% off through the weekend! So, hop on over to see what the Design Team created, be inspired, and then pick up your own set to create with at a discount!! Sounds like a great idea to me! So, what are you waiting for! Head on over and see…….
8 That is why I am boldly asking a favor of you. I could demand it in the name of Christ because it is the right thing for you to do, 9but because of our love, I prefer just to ask you. So take this as a request from your friend Paul, an old man, now in prison for the sake of Christ Jesus.
If you’re looking for a fantastic, non-animated family-friendly DVD to add to your collection, I highly recommend this masterpiece. Overall, it was refreshing to see Scorsese make like Walt Disney for Hugo—the director’s first use of 3D. The Blu-ray version includes the film in 3D format.
Many thanks to the sharer from Holland for making this available.
As to this dangerousness, Boyd tells me that the one biker who was injured and found at the scene, Laddarious Clay of Birmingham, was sporting a holster on each hip and told the police that he had given the pistols to the other bikers. I guess that was enough to scare the Adamsville cops.
o License In Process
the trip to the Aloft hotel was an adventure. three Tube lines and one above ground train. Smooth travelling, easy enough to do but tiring when you are carrying 12 kilograms on your back – you betcha.
Cute and warm and fuzzy--and good for our hearts in more ways than one!
But though we don't inspire the bards
Two thirds of my listed copy choices aren’t strictly adverts. However, they are all selling something. From the concept of all encompassing primal fear to…a nice hot beef drink.
Can I tell a story about my in-laws with some exaggerations for the sake of making the world a little happier? Do I need a third blog that is just my imagination based off of real events that I have to make up in my head to keep from killing people? This was never an issue before as I never said the narrative that plays in my head, out loud. It may even be relief for my in-laws as they would then have an explanation as to why I chuckle to myself the entire time they are around.
Just like the title of this blog post spoiled, I decided to go skydiving. Okay, I should probably clarify. I half-decided to go skydiving. Because I’m a scaredy-Cat. (Get it, Cat – my name is Catherine – okay. I probably shouldn’t have to explain it. Moving along.)
I've consumed more super-hoppy ales this spring and summer than the rest of my years on earth combined. People from my generation are branded by our consumption I'm... damn trendy. My cells are constructed from molecules sold by Widmer, Deschutes, and the Lucky Labrador. So this summer has been a pretty good time.
For the salads, arrange the lettuce in large salad bowls or on dinner plates. Arrange the grilled fruit on top of the lettuce, dividing evenly among the dishes, and top with the strips of grilled chicken. Sprinkle the fresh raspberries over the top of the salad and drizzle with the pineapple vinaigrette. If you’d like, you may also sprinkle some sliced almonds on top of the salads.
Then this past Tuesday, I tune in to WGN for the Cubs game and see CM Punk throwing out the first pitch and then later in the game, singing Take Me Out to the Ballgame. Here is this week's First Pitch Friday ATCRCS card:
NOTE: We and God are known by what pleases us
1/4 C sugar (for coating)
The problem with this obvious point, is that most of the population do not have the same obvious way of thinking about how to go about getting more food. They have absolutely no idea about how to get food in the wilderness. After they get a few miles out of the city and don't see any bananas hanging from the trees, or deer to shoot with their Glock 17 (9 mm pistol) the vast majority are going to take some other course of action.
When I started The Zurian Child, I had to do a lot of online research to figure out the details of the planet I wanted my aliens to be from. By searching through the NASA sight, I learned about Planet Quest and set out to find a planet that fit the description I had in mind. When I checked “planets within multiple planet systems” and “Terrestrial”, links to nine planets appeared in my search results. When I do the same thing today, seventeen planets pop up, most of them discovered since the Kepler mission began.
Two days later Judd reached the site of the floating lab, but if it was still intact it had definitely sunk into the sea, beyond his reach. The detachable snake dock was missing, ripped from its moorings and now the sooty waves crashed onto the steps that climbed down into the water.
This morning was 1 RM for Back Squat, which I so happened to PR last week. This week though I stayed at that weight of 145lbs. I tried 150 but I wasn’t getting that weight up today. Another day and hopefully more than a 5lb PR!
Montezuma is best described, as I saw it, as having a hippie vibe. Colorful, carefree, and very young. Everyone was tattooed with Hindu symbols, wore board shorts, shirtless (the men, anyway), and topped with dreadlocks. I actually saw shops where you could get dreadlocks yourself. Apparently braided and beaded spring break hairstyles are out.
Beef Stew
She is free from harm
So it's a busy week around here.
Spa/Plunge – Similar to the ice bath, but you also use the contrast of warm water, or in this case a spa. Our last training session of every week, sees us walk up to the recovery centre and into the spa (which is pure bliss) for around a minute and then into the cold plunge pool (up to our necks!!!) for a couple of minutes and then repeat 3 times. The first time is always the worst and there is always that mid way spot up the body which doesn’t quite like the cold water, but once your in, you tend to go numb pretty quickly!
Books & Recordings for Catechists:
Method for Red Capsicum and Walnut Sauce
The mind boggles.....
Some also imply that the sex is "better", I do not have the personal experience with which to judge that claim, but I strongly suspect that it depends upon what sort of sex you are looking for, and that may bring us closer to an answer.
Americans and our political leaders are torn between the ideals we cherish--self-determination, individual liberty, and humanitarian concern for others seeking to achieve these--and the practical requirements of running a rich and populous consumer society now dependent on other countries for many of its critical resources. I would contend that it is this tension which underpins America's increasing ineffectiveness at achieving its foreign policy goals.
Regardless of what others would say or think.
Honestly, i couldn't bear the thinking of letting Gabriel at home. But i pushed myself to do so. Of course we sent him to his grandma. Hubby already planned this on and I don't want to let him down, plus I also want to watch 'The Avengers' movie.. :P
This pre made crusty crust sat in the pantry.
In her grief, Lisa turned to what she was always known for: giving. In honor of John, she and friends established a foundation called Soles for Souls. Here is what she writes about it:
Posted by Darren
Plan: Make handbags of the above. I think the sleeves would make a number of cute little cell phone or camera bags. The felt purse projects are now lined up in proper order behind a dozen or so others. Strange thing, though, about my orderly plans. Sometimes projects jump queue, and next thing you know, lovely chaos!
ABV=%
Morning stretch.
“done it all” in terms of living the Rock and Roll lifestyle.
And, how about a few other Fun Challenges for "It's a Dog's Life Side Step Card":
Simply put, they are bloody stupid, and they rule us. Furthermore Zoooooma says they will rule us until the second coming. I believe him.
For when it is over and done at the end of the day,
And now the seven questions about you...
UPDATE (26th March): Nikon has today issued a statement confirming the price increases. However, Nikon add they will be honouring the original prices to retailers on all customer pre-orders placed before March 24th 2012.
Strickland responded by filing a flurry of legal paperwork, seeking an emergency stay of Salvant’s order. But his requests were denied.
Kudos to my former partner R.M. Kinore for her invaluable assistance during the revision process on this story. Truly, The Galloping Ghoul of Hockomock Swamp wouldn’t have existed without her research skills.
The city of Elantris was once a pinnacle of greatness. Random individuals from the kingdom of Arelon would wake up to find themselves transformed into Elantrians, white-haired god-like beings who could harness the power of the Aons and achieve near-immortality. However, ten years before the book takes place place, Elantris was cursed. Now the people of Arelon sometimes wake up turned into leprous zombie-creatures and are cast into the decaying remnants of Elantris to rot.
At minute 18, a back-up police car arrives at the scene and at least one more officer joins in. This is when the tasering starts, amid police requests to "stop resisting." After more prolonged tasers, Thomas is wailing and multiple officers are piled on top of him. At minute 20, Thomas cries out to his father, who isn't there: "Dad! Dad! Dad! Help me, help me Dad!"
This is another cloudless, though beautiful sunrise in Stuart, Florida. This is an amazing place and the opportunities are countless. There is a stretch of rock with all shapes and types. Light was great that morning and allowed for some interesting side lit items such a the wave action around this lonesome rock.
How Did Razors Become Safe?
“Take it slow. No five-hour dates. Less frequent and shorter dates will slow down the addictive love process and allow you to assess whether this is a good guy who is truly interested in being with you (Kirschner, 2009).”
8. What/who do you hope to find/see/accomplish at BOOBs 2011?
Why It’s Working: Users clock in volunteer time so they can focus on doing more good and less on keeping track of hours. The more hours logged and activity shared, the greater chance both volunteers and organizations have to win cash and prizes.
- waving - daddy taught you this and you wave now!
It’s been 50 years in the making.
And there in the back corner, buried behind a pile of kayaks, fishing poles, and pup tents, I find their firearms section.
Anyway- That is why I am determined to blog about the randomness of life. It most likely won’t lead to anything- not like that fabulous Bloggess.
We have all seen images of various optical illusions or visual phenomena floating around on the internet. One example is the figure-ground concept, where initially, we can only perceive either the figure in the picture or the background, as in the following image:
Master Chapman’s end of term report does not look good. Epidemiology- fail, maths – fail, science – fail, economics – fail, and now history- fail. Must try harder, even in the remedial class.
We're about to go to the hospital to visit him, so I made him this card to hang on his wall for him to admire until he's discharged. That's his motorcycle; he rode it in yesterday and obviously did not ride it home so we're keeping it in the garage.
The fear factor has been greatly diminished. And, by the way, we commend you, because the work that all of you are doing in bringing forth the open conversations with the galactics, with the inter-galactics, with the star-seeds, this is making it the new normal, and it is removing that veil of something unusual or paranormal.
I will try other paper and card stock and see how I get on, but I think using the pens on the stamps directly seems the best way, for me, to go.
But who is on trial? When one has done nothing wrong he has little to fear. I am reading Psalm 56:4.
It was while I was on that holiday, incidentally, that I got the first germ of an idea for a novel that I wanted to set in and around that village - for those of you who have never been, Crete, and particularly southern Crete, is an incredibly fertile place in terms of its history, mythology and geography. I’ve made a few stabs at writing that book since, and at this stage I reckon I’ve written the best part of a million words on it, over the course of a number of drafts; and lately it has started to bubble up in the back of my mind again, as a fresh way of telling the story starts to take shape.
Many people like events. If something happen unexpectedly, people think that is more fun and exciting. This creme brûlée guy tweets the newly-serving menu and the location all the time, it is human instinct to be curious and guess what could be the next. You cannot expect this to the normal-brick restaurants.
Reading: Whoever eats* my flesh and drinks my blood has eternal life, and I will raise him on the last day. (John 6:54)
One year ago, the concentric circles joining Ross' interests, and my interests, drifted into two wholly different spheres of their own. I was (still am) addicted to the novelties of Austin; Ross was immersed in fascinations all his own.
21.Fifteen (15才)
There are aspects of software development that make it difficult to know the actual score, which is the amount of value produced. Value is a lagging indicator which you don’t really know until after somebody has used what you have provided and given you back something in return. Most of the ways of “keeping score” within Agile, such as burn up and velocity, are really only a proxy for the real score (value produced), but they are still important to know and monitor.
As Howard writes, already by October 20, 1973, “there were 15 accredited Death Angels in California.” With the dozen aspiring Death Angels attending the loft meetings at Black Self help, that makes for 27. But there may have been as many as 50 Death Angels.
What was the greatest challenge you faced in the creation of the movie?
So the film looks good, has some easy laughs – nothing cheap here – and goes down smoothly. The views of Rome, the Eternal City, are spectaular and this is so even though we spend most of the time in Trastavere, a somewhat non-touristy neighborhood.
Today’s Podcast will cover the topic – All shipshape.
My hair is so smooth! It feels so healthy and looks so shiny. All in all this has been a great experience. My hair is lees frizzy, stronger, more manageable, and people compliment me all the time about how great my hair looks.
Bake for 20 minutes, till the eggs are set
Narrowed green eyes peered at her and Norma smiled brightly, “You can snap at me all you want.”
Big blue tufted seat….love
Locally-grown food has always been a big deal in the San Francisco Bay Area, at least in my years here. We don’t just see local-ish food from Watsonville or the Capay Valley anymore, even though those lush fields are only a couple of hours away. Food from around the corner and down the street is making its way out into restaurants and markets. Sam, a self-proclaimed “universal remote or MacGyver” at Dig Deep Farms and Produce calls it an Urban Agriculture Movement. He says, “I didn’t realize this many people were into urban agriculture; like Phat Beets, People’s Grocery, City Slicker Farms, the Ecology Center in Berkeley—I think it’s a movement that hasn’t taken off full force yet, but it’s starting to.” He couldn’t be more right. Dig Deep Farms and Produce is an example of a farm down the street. They have four sites in the unincorporated area of Alameda County, two of which are within blocks of their Ashland office—Pacific Apparel and the Firehouse, both aptly named after a neighboring building. I was lucky enough to visit both!
It features a wonderful pattern & has a little door at the front with a little latch.
UDPP - base
It rained this morning enough that I had to walk the dog. The fernleaf peonies are ready to open. I hope they wait until the last rain tomorrow so they don't get spoiled. I have five of these planted in different locations of the property. All but one has buds on them. The one is a transplant from a year ago so it needs to mature some more.
And, the other night while heading toward the Beaudry stop on the Metro (that is the one with the highest concentration of gay bars) I saw a human on the train that is just about as close to looking like the dude in this Brom painting as is humanly possible (with an even more beautiful face…reminiscent of some young Conan stuff I’ve seen). He was even hanging onto the pole in a manner similar to in the pic. One would think I would close with something in French after seeing that beautiful creature, but all I can come up with for some reason is Je me souviens.
It’s a fine line to walk. It’s a line that, at the time of writing (late Thursday night) Josep “Pep” Guardiola is mentally walking. It’s well known that the Barcelona manager only commits to a rolling yearly deal and so this is a decision he makes every season. However, the important thing to remember is that in every other season he has made the decision by now. Here we are in April and Guardiola’s prospective contract remains unsigned. La Liga is all but over, the title destined for the Bernebeu and their hated rivals Real Madrid, Barca were dumped out of the Champions League by Chelsea and now have only the Copa del rey to play for, against Athletic Bilbao.
Blackboard painted.
“I give it to them,” replied the lawyer, “and then I send them a bill.”
I found a cute little saying online but I am sorry I don't know who to give the credit to so if you know please tell me so I can.
You might know someone like this. It might be a someone at your office, in your church, or maybe a member of your own family. These are a few questions you might want to ask this person. Were you ever bitter? How did you learn how to forgive? What’s your relationship with them like now? How do you maintain your good attitude? How can you just let go of the hurt, anger, and pain? Are you ever tempted to pick up the anger again? If so, what do you do about it?
Kegged: 07-16-2009
* Not sure of new expectations
"When you sign up for this job you know what you are getting into," Raiola said on Tuesday. "Granted, the money is a lot more now, but at the same time, you know you are going to get dinged up. You are hitting almost every play.
Cosmic Light Shapes were less psych than I thought, but still somewhat lush and droney. I was already very tired by the time they took the stage, but still enjoyed their set. Haze, smoke, whisky, school night. Getting old sucks.
23. Boys don’t WINE.
I again went through the whole story about Leo, the photograph, the grave site, etc.
Wipers
Its me and the silence
. . . Provided, That when the national interest so requires, the President may amend, modify, replace or rescind any contract, concession, permit, licenses or any other form of privilege granted herein . . .
Once upon a time, my blog was about one thing and one thing only: cupcakes. You thought I was going to say being really, really good looking, didn't you? That's just what it's about now. But when this here blog was simply about precious cupcakes, I wrote a girl-crush post about Emily from Cupcakes and Cashmere, in which I questioned whether I should expand my blog's focus (Spoiler Alert: I did).
Name: Jordan Mierek
3. What type of pickups are in your guitar?
Dogfish Head Punkin' Ale
SO HOW DO YOU PRAYER THE ECLIPSE PRAYER?
The money crystal is a necessary product of the exchange process, in which different products of labour are in fact equated with each other, and thus are in fact converted into commodities 181
WHY BRAZIL?
Immediate reaction #1: Aha, so the master plotter is a “graduate” of Frankfurt School and Authoritarian Personality!
Cook for 1-1 1/2 hours. When chicken is fully cooked after an hour, and you want to cook the soup longer to get it more flavorful, take the larger chicken pieces out so they don’t overcook along with a little soup to keep it moist. If you like some chicken in your soup like I do, you’ll put it back in once the soup is ready.
To the point
then the big ones. My soul was crushed, yet I begged God more and more to show
The participant’s guide and DVD arrived in my mailbox a few weeks ago as part of Lysa Terkeust’s blog tour. “Catchy title,” I thought as I placed it in my “review pile” – which is quickly becoming an avalanche waiting to happen. At that point, I wandered into the kitchen between writing projects and clicked open a can of Diet Coke (I love that clicking swoosh sound, don’t you?) And then I opened my pantry door to scour the shelves for a snack, a bag of Baked Doritos stuffed inside a wicker basket. For those that know me from high school and college, you may recall that my favorite snack was Doritos with French Onion Dip – always in ready supply in my dorm room. At that time in my life, I was able to indulge and not even gain a single digit on the scale. Oh how I miss that incredible metabolic rate of my youth!
I like how she manipulates the mic building up to climatic moments and I need to get back to bare foot performances when it’s appropriate. I remember performing barefoot summer of 2010 in Wiky felt good.
I look down as a spot of blood enters the frothy basin below.
Godwin Ajala, 33, New York, N.Y.
The OAS is supposed to be a pan-American organization. Any country in Europe, Africa, Asia or Oceania could not belong to the OAS just because it has a colony, as it is the case of France in Guadeloupe; or the Netherlands in Curaçao. But the British colonialism could not define the status of Canada and explain whether it was a colony, a republic or a kingdom.
Cost: ASA Members: $10
What did she say her name was?
There are SO many amazing websites out there, that I'd love to know what yours is so that I don't miss out.
There were/are strict rules for the construction of the knots and windings that made up (and still make up) the fringe. A tallit was/is treated with extreme respect; therefore, Jesus’ tallit would not have been dragging in the dirt. That would have been a disgrace.
Both say that family holidays to Europe in their teens were responsible for their indoctrination to proper electronic music- and their move to London a little over a year ago proved to be the turning point that helped them shape their current sound. “As a new DJ in the London scene all the cards are against you, but we’ve finally found our niche here,” says Vivie-Ann.
“The move to Cornwall was at my insistence,” Mandy recalls. “We both loved horses and he loved sculpting so we bought a moorland farm for me, started with 35 sheep and ended up with 800.”
In the end, Penultimate does what it aspires to do and that should be worth something. However, it’s hard for me to recommend the app when I consider how many good note taking apps are out there that do the same thing as Penultimate and then some.
Turn the cooked fruit out into a heat proof bowl. Stir in the fresh and ground ginger and the citrus zest. Set aside.
IN BOWL OF STAND MIXER, fitted with dough hook, stir together flour, yeast, sugar and salt. ADD in water and 2 tablespoons of grapeseed oil
After an hour and a half I had to leave, but I was glowing. Even if you're as bad as me, the temptation is just to have one more shot......
The Truth About Mosquitos and Water Gardens
I used a basic white cake recipe (also seen here) from Magnolia Bakery for both to keep things simple and filled and frosted them with a simple buttercream. Sprinkles and a fun corkscrew candle were all the decoration the smash cake needed and a simple dot pattern adorned the main cake.
5. The modern-day examples that the author discusses – Ambani brothers (Duryodhana’s envy), Ramalinga Raju (Dhritarshtra’s bias for his son), etc are engaging.
It got really cold and rainy Saturday. So no beaches. And it got really chilly too at night. It's still very chilly right now. I'm trying to enjoy the cool weather, because in a month, the heat is going to start burning up my part of the world. It's going to get hotter and more humid as the months go along. And come June, it'll be hurricane season again til the end of September. But that's life--things happen, time moves on, and things change. We just keep on living and moving forward.
things on my mind:
Broadcasting live from Las Vegas, we cover the State of the Union, and all in between
Phoenix – Federal Prison Satellite Camp. Main federal facility expanded.
Stripped
It probably isn’t immediately obvious why the Tone Argument is so bad, and I understand that, so let me give you some of the resources that helped me out when I was still trying to figure out how I, as an able-bodied cisgendered white person, could hurt people’s feelings less.
I'm slightly nervous about the whole set-up at the weekend. We've been told we are singing on a portable stage; the side of a lorry I believe. We know we have an hour's set on the Saturday from 1pm but I notice that day there will also be a choir competition involving many of the primary schools from our area. We have kept the same programme for this weekend which we used in the concert for the local WI (I couldn't make it; on holiday) which is basically a number of show tunes. So I have this vision of all these sweet children singing Little Donkey and then us bunch of old farts belting out Razzle Dazzle. I fear it could all go terribly wrong. Thankfully I'm in the chorus so I'm hoping to hide at the back with a woolly hat and shades.
Though Moore is quite the dark, brooding figure, I must admit, I ended up giggling and rolling my eyes towards the end when he is so pathetically groveling on the ground. (The part where the two people gush about their love for each other..) He was turning the entire scene into an entirely dramatic sobfest... I guess it was an emotional thing for them both, but.... gad, man! Get a hold of yourself!
The Union cabinet meets this evening to decide on including a column on “caste” in the 2011 censu, a move seen as a tacit quid pro quo for the support of the the OBC leaders Mulayam Singh Yadav, Lalu Prasad Yadav and Sharad Yadav for their support in getting the cut motion passed in Parliament.
1. It's cold.
So, I got me a little mini makeover for now. I have a challenge on my hands on how to make this space a little more comfortable while spending zero money on a headboard alternative. I have found a few cute ideas out there, that I will likely be posting soon, do you have any free/diy headboard ideas?
I swear I have a serious addition to buttons! I am just drawn to them. It doesn't help that my sister is a total enabler and points them out to me when I miss them :) I picked up a bunch more this weekend, with thoughts of putting them on cards and adding them to my etsy.. but can I really make myself part with any of them???? ahhhhhh
I burst out laughing and said no, I was born with them. You are so lucky, she said. I consider that a compliment on high because, I suspect, in all her years of fitting women, she’s seen enough boobs to know. Men often say anything just to try to have their way with you but I figure she’s a “sister woman” without ulterior motives so she, as Alanis Morissette sings, ”oughta’ know.”
-Clean the whole chicken,wash under running water ,drain in a colander.Keeps aside.Make gashes over the thicker parts of the chicken.
The terms of this deal had already been set in March during a conference convened by the Danish Foreign Ministry in Copenhagen. According to The New York Times, Amr Khaled, an Egyptian preacher, indicated that the boycott of Danish goods could end “if Danes and their government reached out with initiatives like help for small businesses, or health care.”
nursery kids. I was worried that he
Laboring and spinning and worrying, laboring and spinning and worrying, round and round I go. This is precisely how I started my day. Even the flowers of the field know better. My very first awake, pillow-thought was one of worry. Side by side, was another thought I whispered gently and quietly as to not disrupt the morning's peace. "Worry is a sin, the Bible tells me NOT to worry. I am going to read my Bible and counteract these worrisome thoughts."
I used my folders as backgrounds for these projects, but I think the dotted one would make a good texture on a smaller cut. I hope you enjoyed my tutorial. I look forward to your improvements and designs.
Origin of Origins, Samij Datta, 2012
I am just happy the past few weeks have been put behind us. We are so thankful for Alex taking this whole experience like a trooper! He has been one steadfast, amazing little boy! I am 100% positive that he is stronger than most people I know...including me!
To achieve its goals the company has created an ‘accountability model’ which will make every Microsoft business unit responsible for the carbon they generate. The model aims to create incentives for greater efficiency, increase purchases of renewable energy and improve their environmental impact.
‘I can’t.’
Sweet totally hand-stitched by me using old green flannel,
It’s not simple to think about being 35 ½ weeks pregnant next week. It’s not simple because 35 ½ weeks is when we lost you.
Whip cream on high speed for a few minutes until soft peaks start to form. Add powder sugar, orange and vanilla extract, and whip a little bit longer until you have reached a light and fluffy, whip creamy consistency.
Do you still feel like
Features :
St. Michan’s is of note to us because Sherri’s Great-Great-Great-Great-Great-Grandfather, Robert Donnelly was baptized here in the late 1700′s. While we were inside we were able to see the baptismal font that he was baptized in.
Bush's directorial debut, "The Line, The Cross, The Curve".
He see’s right where we are and has the perfect plan already carved out for us. We just have to let Him work, choose Him over the feelings and emotions we experience in these kind of situations. They lie to us, He is Truth.
i eat it as i walk down bay parkway
Screw you to employers who haven't given pay raises in over 7 years, not even "cost of living" raises, but expect their employees to work more and more and more with no extra incentives.
But therein lies a lesson to any folk who might still be subscribing to the unfortunate preconception that 'all ales taste the same'. After featuring nearly 80 brews during this project - for two similar beers to crop up on only one consecutive occasion must say something about the sheer variety on offer in the modern world of finely crafted ale.
The AIA will expand the scope of inventions to which a defence of infringement based on a prior use of an invention applies. Currently, a defence based on prior use is available only with respect to a method of doing or conducting business (see 35 USC §273). Under the AIA, the defence will be available for a process, a machine, manufacture, or composition of matter used in a manufacturing or other commercial process regardless of the field of technology. A substantial commercial use of the invention must be made at least one year before the earlier of either the effective filing date or the first disclosure of the invention claimed in the patent against which a defence is asserted. However, this defence is not available if the patent against which this defence is asserted was owned or to be subject to an obligation of assignment to universities at the time of invention. This defence will apply to any patent issued after 16 September 2011.
It is easy to bond with someone and gain their trust, as long as they are receptive to it. Find similar interests and build a friendly interaction with them. Compliment their taste and their superior judgement.
of us go through our entire lives cringing at our own ways of using our own language(s), native languages included, because we apparently do things that “the languages” do not allow us to do. Assigning decision power of this kind to “the languages” is of course a good way of skirting the issue that whatever evaluative benchmarks
I hope you have enjoyed reading it (and cooking it) as much as John and I have in bringing it to you!
reiterates the two significant reasons I needed to make this move.
This is the best part:
Right now it feels like the story might have grown bigger than my ability to write it.
i went back and forth on how to incorporate it into a theme.
Trying to please your kids that love the outdoors is easy to do at WDW. There are
“Yeah, but look.” Marvin held the concern higher, “it’s an expensive, high end model. It must belong to someone.”
That evening quail came and covered the camp, and in the morning there was a layer of dew around the camp. When the dew was gone, thin flakes like frost on the ground appeared on the desert floor. When the Israelites saw it, they said to each other, “What is it?” For they did not know what it was.”
Praise for them springing fresh from the Word.
Celery, cut into 3” length
"Love, the deadliest of all deadly things.
We also set a tentative birthday for Miss Kelly Bean! Unless she decides to show up on her own earlier, I'm scheduled for a c-section on July 2. Yup... that's a whole week after her due date. The doctor wanted to do it on the 25th, but I asked her if we could do it later. See, my husband's company has their fiscal year end that week. Excellent timing, no?
Surprisingly, the PBDE content patterns seen in the world’s salmon do not match up with the levels found in people; samples of blood and fat from North Americans contain levels 10 times higher, on average, than Europeans, another reason to think some other source of exposure is also at work. Bergman thinks the high U.S. levels are due to inhalation of these substances.
We’ve spent a lot of time and effort and money into advancing everything we come across. You know what we’ve made more amazing and powerful? LIGHTBULBS?! Light-FUCK-bulbs! Remember lightbulbs? You screw one into the lamp and light comes out? Doesn’t get much more fuckin’ simple than that as far as technology is concerned, right? Apparently, WRONG. We have to invent ones that are brighter, last longer, and save electricity.
We were all very sad when Lorraine H decided to re-locate back to Tassy, Lorraine was a very involved group member, taking on Leadership of the Thursday night group, and always happy to share her knowledge and tips, lots of which she learned from the many local classes and retreats that she attended.
But then I realised there was. I’d tied my hair back.
I couldn't keep it up, though, and the hills sapped me of my energy. I made it to just about mile 2.5 before I gave in and walked. I was so mad at myself, but my heart and my head just weren't in the game. I walked until an older man passed me, looked over, and said, "Hey! Don't let this old man beat you!" I started jogging again and stayed in front of him for a little bit but he passed me up. However, I did manage to run the rest of the race even though my pace dropped by almost a minute.
10 An Echo Of Night 2:22
“I am Paulo. I saw that tree in a dream. Spanish gold coins are buried beneath it. Finding this treasure is my personal folklore.”
Luke and I were working as a team Saturday night. I hauled all his clothes out of his closet and started sorting out what was too small. (Are you jealous yet? What an action packed life I lead!) On the questionable items, I had Luke try on the pants and/or shirts to see if they fit. This is how it played out:
instead (as the week of searing labor rallies reaches its dangerous pitch--"dangerous" because I still fear mistaking non-immediacy for non-effect) "minimized" it. And opened onto Bhanu Kapil's this:
Used to the blue tears, blue sorrow
While we’re parading you out
OPINION: 3 STARS
In my quest to ‘Discover Durban’ I went to the Florida Road market on Saturday, unfortunately we got there a bit late and the most of the stalls had already closed for the day. But while I was on Florida Road I decided to go into the frozen yoghurt shop called Wakaberry, I had seen the shop before – but never went in because I’m mostly on Florida Road at night.
Sammy-All boy. Loud. Getting into everything. Bad sleeper. Took out morning nap. Now a great sleeper. Dang it. Loud. Getting into everything. Loud. So funny. Signs please. Loud. Almost walking by himself.
